N if you want to wait in line behind the dumbest people on earth come here.
N worlds largest starbucks but with just a very few seats.
P caramel pumpkin spice - yum!!!
N try the shut-the-cunt-up; it's breathtaking.
P barista rockin the black bow tie and black rimmed glasses... hot! thank you for the smile =p
N horrible service!!! all the orders were messed up and the staff could care less.
P the great thing about this branch, that they close at 1 a.m.
U lugar salvador em qualquer lugar do mundo para se tomar café da manhã!! adoro os biscoitos madeleines!!
P this starbucks is huge!!!! nice! ;)
P gorgeous starbucks, but it's slow. none of the patrons seem to know how starbucks works.
P nicest starbucks i've ever seen
P in the madness of times square this is a nice oasis.
P one of my absolute favorite starbucks, big, airy and i know all of the staff. the clover counter service? there are not words for how good and swift the service is...
N really pretty starbucks, but also one of the few without any outlets and more tourists than locals. not worth it.
P good place :)
P the bigger the better !!! beautiful
P the staff is very honest and friendly, i accidently gave the cashier an extra ten, and she went out of her way to give me proper change.
P since the renervations, perfect sb!
P nicely renovated location. clover brew!
U go in to charge your phone and use the bathroom and actually never buy anything!
P the baristas that work here in the afternoon are the best. the morning staff aren't as friendly.
N worst starbucks in nyc! avoid!!!
P one of my favorites ... can just sit and watch for a while :)
P excellent workers here!
P best bathrooms in times square.
P this place is just awesome, it refreshes your mood before going to work
P u really need to experience this place and listen to all the different languages, you then know what it means to be at the cross roads of the world
U meeting. @spencerscott
P hot chocolate with cream in winter =ddd
P good location but a bit crowded. great staff btw.
P m8 to the 6 is mos def the way to go #cattlecars
U bringing hipsters and trustafarians together
P much faster cross-town trip than the m14. too bad it doesn't run on weekends.
U stay off the bayonne flyer if you want to get to zep hall
U finally got it....ima get my game on!
U stay in nyc!
P ask for the becky special. it will cost you a little more, but it is worth it.
U warning !! the girl broke your wallet !!!
U u probably spent ur whole income tax
P good prices with hot girls, it’s an extreme time! if you're here before 5pm, you're lucky enough to avoid a cover charge. brought to you by the the expendables opening august 13!
N the strippers don't really like you.
P greatest beach
N leave early or wait in line
P tuesdays it's family day.. discounted round trip tickets .. check it out!
U preview of new products this coming thursday & friday!
U it's new year's 2012 in times square! check out our website for the official news, schedules, faq's, & everything you need to know about celebrating nye in times square! http://www.timessquarenyc.org
U hello gorgeous…it’s time to party. visit the bare escentuals times square boutique for our fashion’s night out event on 9/8. call the times square to make your reservation for a free make-under!
P good enough if you're looking for a building close to the path station.
P sweet home...
P if you have new dollar bills and need quarters use the other machine in the far right (not the mail room).
U the sleeping tiger
U the employees only of the eastside.
P surprisingly great scotch selection
P $9 martinis from 6-8 and adorable bartenders! not to mention a con
P great place to bring some friends and chat. the cocktails are amazing. try the dark 'n stormy!
P here for tasting on tuesday's. today mezcal
P get your cocktail crash course here. the bartenders are always willing to give you a story.
U become a fan of them on facebook so you know what’s going down there on tnt: tuesday night tasting at 7 p.m. drink for free and get info about what it is that you’re drinking!
U they don't carry all wine on menu
P excellent cocktails and u can hear each other speak
P tino the bartender is super-sweet and makes a mean cocktail. try the flowers on the wall.
P they have a pretty good gouda cheese sandwich
U lion's tail: bourbon, lime juice, pimento dram, gomme syrup, angostura bitters.
U the sazerac a new orleans version of the old fashioned. named after the sazerac de forge et fils brand of cognac. it is sometimes considered the oldest known cocktail.
U el diablo is not on the menu, but it's on the list behind the bar. it's a cross-dressed margarita.
P sazerac is the secret awesome.
P great place
P get the matilda, then w/ mind blown talk w/ trevor about rock history & the scene today. then ask for his special the stirred word.
P friendly staff. try the 404 if you like your drinks on the fruity (but not too sweet) side.
U ask peter for a cocktail
U i'lppo
P great place, really chill, amazing cocktails. try the "milk punch" as an amazing night cap.
P el diablo is super spicy but great if your into that
P our favorite hangout in town!!  we'll probably pop in for the us v. england world cup match.
P if you like vodka, these two are great: flowers on the wall + kartoshka cocktail.
U picklebacks!
U kir royale.
P gianfranco's tuesday night tastings. nuff said
P glenmorangie original. awesome staff. great bar.
U square ice cubes
U look at how close we were because of walk 97.5!! we love you!!
U us at the pink concert courtesy of walk 97.5 contest. vip tickets on the today show! 9/18/2012
P keep it up walk i love love the xmas music and the regular music go 70 80 90 2k and now
U facebook.com/walk975 !!
N avoid the upstairs men's locker room. it sinks like rotten zombie feet!
N go through the garage entrance to the hotel, u will get to experience the most pointlessly difficult to traverse revolving door east of the mississippi.   use the normal doors on either side instead.
P i recommend taking kendra's dance class on fridays. she is wonderful.
P bigger lockers and newer machines!
P fitness=freedom
P one of the best personal trainers work here: marquis. he works you out in a very different and effective way compare  to serveral other trainers on the floor! with results
P tuesdays: craig hunter spin rocks. wed: hip hop with rick fri: total body with kendra. boxing with fahad is the bomb.
U sk energy tip: to prevent workout plateau and a loss of consistent results, change your fitness routine every 4-6 weeks. keep the sk before it consistent to make sure you get the best workout.
P tuesday 6:30pm power dance class is amazing!teacher is phenomenal!followed by 7:30pm abs makes a great workout!
N not the best spin location. the room has no air flow.
N because of its centralized location near lots of midtown offices, during "happy hour" it gets exactly as crowded as the sports bars around here. be prepared to wait for lockers and treadmills.
N pool can get crowded during peak hours. either come early or come late
U nice showers but the pressure had me feeling like travolta in pulp fiction after calling the wolf in for shooting marvin in the face.
N this gym is pretty impossible to find, so give yourself an extra ten minutes.
N poor at&t reception. dealbreaker for me. can't stream music or even check email. much better at equinox or golds gym few blocks down
N taking a shower is like standing in a rain of needles. not enjoyable.
P pool is good :)
U if u do not want to wait 10 mins sharing equipments, then go btw 2 and 5pm. always few people during those hours!!!
U that odd feeling when the hotel guests are so dressed and you're all sweaty...
U doesn't open till 8 on sundays
U they say gyms is common place for couples to meet. check out this tip on how to strike up conversation at your next workout! http://ow.ly/60gan
P boxing a 12:30 is a must!
P love this location!
N absolutely disgusting. cramped locker room, filthy machines, smells like koolaid.
P pool is nice
U pool closed till dec 4
U this place is like construction junction right now. but it'll all be worth it!
U used to be my local spot. undergoing renovation and it's bit of a mess right now. it'll be like this for about three months, they say.  top floor locker room is closed, the pool is still open though.
U doing construction here now through january 2011. use the one on 52nd and broadway or the one on 41st and 8th.
P great swimming pool staff.
U pm library has programs for children, teens and adults all year long. the library also has dedicated family programs for families to enjoy together. check out the calender for events and registration.
U check out our nooks and read an e-book. try one out before purchasing an e-reader.
U download audiobooks from overdrive at the download station!
U try out the big scanner- can print out, scan to usb or email.
U wireless printing
N look out for all the bums, they are everywhere.
U we think you’re gonna like it here! explore the world of annie with history, games, and a peek behind the scenes of the musical.
U check in at palace theater to unlock exclusive video footage about the impact of this location on judy garland's life, brought to you by end of the rainbow on broadway.
P shepherds pie is delish.
U skip chicken fingers. huge globs of rubber. fries were awesome.
P this place was great and the bartender was very nice and friendly.
U don't get corned beef if you are not irish!
P too crowded downstairs? venture upstairs for more places to sit and have a drink!
P jerk chicken salad is refreshing
P good people!
P the james joyce burger, yes please. $7 beers, but hey, that's times square for ya.
P chicken fingers are awesome
P the irish chicken gets two pinky rings & thumbs up
P fish and chips were lovely.  pair with a cider and all is good
P the shepard's pie is delicious!
P cajun fries and camimari! pretty relaxed upstairs
P roast beef sandwitchwes are great!
U no free shot with foursquare checkin :(
U free shot with every 4square check in!
U with rachel conforti and mark emery, taking a break from iab.
U "the most important things to do in the world are to get something to eat, something to drink, and somebody to love you." - brendan francis behan
P order the shepherd's pie, it's superb!
P most amazing food! don't bother with the other pubs.
P the french fries are great here.
P try the fish and chips, they're amazing!
P great place to get good, different varieties of beers and a great place to watch the ufc fights.
P this is my favorite irish pub in nyc!! seán & joe at the bar are awesome!! great food & service. i always feel comfortable sitting at the bar by myself.
P joe at the bar is hella cool!
P the crapper is the warmest seat in the house.
P ask to be seated upstairs for a drink and dessert after a show.
P burger, fish n chips, shep pie, chicken pot pie, or sampler. say hi to jimmy on you're way in
P good starbucks
P one of my favorite places on earth. i love to go to broadway its a magical place :)
P when we're feeling like over-the-top fun, we head for a rambunctious musical like wicked or chicago, and when we’re in a more grown-up mood, we go off broadway for hits like avenue q and richard ii.
P broadway or off-broadway... if you appreciate the arts, a show is a must! so many to choose from! where to start?!
U buy your tickets online at broadwaybox.com for good seats at good price.
P go see a show. broadway, best in world
U theatre chat is a not for profit sharing the arts for all. join usa theatre chat,  nyc theatre chat, chicago theatre chat...
U don't bother seeing mamma mia...very disappointing...movie way better
U anyone already get superswarm badge?
U everyone who checked in before 11am recheck in since we are still so close but not there yet need 18 more people!
U 10 lagi ayoo..
U ian s : ada bang !!? mw beli brpa bang ?? yooo...cang kacang, mi popmi, yg dingin yg dingin yg dingin, aqua aqua aqua...
U @dicky f. aih aak ini, kcang 2 rbuan aj pk ditawar jg...mijon g jualan tu bang, cb gw pnggilin tmen ane ye !?!? jek, mijon atu jek...
U bid on a chance to make your broadway debut at the broadway flea market grand auction.  details online at www.broadwaycares.org
U yak sambil nunggu!! yg kacang, yg kcg, yg kcg...yo msh anget, msh anget 2000rb-an !?!? yooo...
U one of my favorite events of the year! go to stage-rush.com for full concert recap and set list!
U ready for super swarm :beer:
U it's back2broadway month. events, discout offers and more. go to back2broadway.com to get all the info and the best deals.
U fans give west side story 4.00 stars out of 5 on theateradvisor.com. it's back2broadway. here is a special offer for you. click more info and use code save18 for discount tickets.
U fans give billy elliot 4.56 stars out of 5 on theateradvisor.com. it's back2broadway. here is a special offer for you. click more info and use code b2b10 for discount tickets.
U fans give the addams family 3.80 stars out of 5 on theateradvisor.com. it's back2broadway. here is a special offer for you. click more info and use code b2b10 for discount tickets.
U fans give memphis 4.00 stars out of 5 on www.theateradvisor.com. it's back2broadway. here is a special offer for you. click more info and use code b2b10 for discount tickets.
U make sure you remember to pee on the trash cans in the courtyard! everyone does it.
P so chilled before the evening crowd arrives. the staff are very friendly.
P my favorite place..best cosmos and great atmosphere
P the staff is super friendly.  great place to be fabulous.
P great city view and feels like a private bar - blissfully unpopulated. -gary
P first table on the right when u come in is excellent spot to people watch!!
P good di on friday night's
U very expensive drinks
P the more french martinis you order the more cherries are gifted in your glass. - michellec.tv
P cozy ambiance
N way over priced and probably the worst of the 20 w hotels o have stayed in - something is always wrong with the room and the staff don't care - great bar though - try union squre for a better hotel
P great bar! great lounge.. dj kalkutta spinning on wed she bring the life to the party!!
U came here on a whim, decent service, weird security camera on the large screen, good gin and tonic, strange crowd (people shopping at 2am?).
N too f'ing crowded on a fri night
P this is the center of the center of the universe.  most of my favorite nights in manhattan over the past decade have started here.
P nice place for a few cocktails
P more jack daniels... i was told by the waitress the pure silk is their best drink. my girlfriend says its "excellent!". i like whisky, what can i do.
P get the grapefruit basil martini... it is amazing!!
P excellent lemon drop martinis-- this bar is on the 7th floor of the w times square
U free wifi for an hour at a time, but dim lighting
P my go-to for a great burger. get the bacon royale - long, thick slices of bacon
P imho, the best burger in nyc.  any of them will do...medium rare and delicious.
P very good burgers and awesome $5 bloody mary's.
P heated garden!  good burger!
P best burger on the island: bacon royale or go home!! awesome bartenders too & great drinks.
P one of the best, if not the best, burger's i've had in the city. awesome bartenders and great patio.
U i just like connecting#pdsk1996
P great patio area in the back.  try their burgers.  this spot could easily go under ""best burger in manhattan""
P kickass bartender.
P not better than black iron. but has an outdoor garden w an tv outside to watch game. and the best onion rings in the city. perfect football spot.
P the royale with cheese, onion rings
P best burger in nyc.
N burgers are not great (fuck hype)
U server s online#
U the bathrooms are like going into narnia
P gem on avenue c.  when the weather is nice, they have a great patio in the back.  good burgers, reasonably priced.  highly recommend stopping by if you're in the area.
U folks, the 50% discount is only redeemable for up to $10 and it is only good for in-restaurant dining. shame.
P decent burgers at a decent price ( hint: scoutmob! )
U royale157 ave c (btw e 9th & 10th st), new york, ny 10009(212) 254-6600   royalenyc.com
P aviva has a great fuckin poor!
P great music here!
U like most things in nyc, la burgers are better.
P ask for the piggyback shot. whiskey shot followed by. shot of pickle juice and finished with a piece of bacon. one of a kind
P great burger!  skip fries, go rings.
P best burger alert!
P if you don't like beef, the veggie burger is superb.
P top 5 best burgers downtown
P $3 pints during happy hour, but it ends at 7 & on friday / saturday you need to order food to sit outside
P bring your own board games and snag one of the picnic tables out back.
P one of the best burger joints in nyc!
P drinks - the british and barrack #18 on tap. they have a decent selection on tab. dj friday and saturday after 11. no cover. pretty bartender!
U coffee refills ain't free. :-(
U bartender has a heavy hand with vodka
P calamari is amazing! reasonable food prices too!
P happy hours m-th 4-7pm and fridays 3-7 (live music at 5:30) .   happy hour = half price drinks.    dj fri and sat at 11!!! never a cover!!!!!!   amazing food!!  try the public burger or reuben, etc...
P come visit me at the bar!!  mondays, tuesdays, fridays and saturdays.... day/ happiest hours!!!!  1/2 price drinks!!!!!    :d
P tons of youngins here after 11.
P come say "hi!" i work fri 11-7 (happy hour 3-7 1/2 price drinks!  addictive food!). and sat 11-7!!!
P great music and dancing
P foods freakin great.
P football sunday specials!! $2.50 bud light drafts and 1/2 off wings!
P just tried p'unkin from harvest... cinnamon sugar rim is delicious :)
P chicken nachos are the best! also loved the goat cheese croquette salad. great atmosphere
P buffalo wingggsss!!!
P the mac n' cheese is amazing.
P try the goat cheese croquette salad :)
P outstanding chicken club
P fried rice is delish!!!
N foods not bad but the music sucks!
P natasha roll (lobster tempura, mango, salmon) is the f shit bomb here!
P try the blueberry mojitos!
P amazing hibachi
P happy hour oysters $1 each!
P awesome drink selection
P the garden margarita is amazing! seriously. i think i'm addicted. ha :)
P yummy yummy yummy. the garden variety margarita with kale juice and smoked sea salt is deliish!!!
U every drink we had tasted delicious except the smoked and roasted. it tasted like how a dentist office smells.
P order from peter...best bartender in nyc!
P great drinks. nice staff. food was good. laid back crowd.
P banjo fans:: inhale the smoke with both mouth and nose for full apple pie effect.
P definitely grab their only stirred drink: angela's arch. mezcal, rye, malbec reduction, aperol, and bitters. perfect.
P don't miss the jalisco fizz and garden variety margarita! tasty drinks, but they totally pack a punch.
U per erik !!!!
P watermelon drink is quite tasty.
P great cocktails- get the garden variety margarita or the cumin my cocktail.
U watermelon cocktail: bedford cruise has vodka, fresh watermelon, fennel-infused agave and lemon soda.
U after hours jam: bourbon, apricot jam, chipotle agave, lemon, angostura bitters.
U garden variety margarita: blue agave blanco tequila, ginger & kale juice, lime juice, agave nectar, smoked sea salt.
P the bedford cruise... perfect summer cocktail
P vibe? homey known for? a selection of killer cocktails like the bedford cruise (vodka, fresh watermelon juice, lemon juice, agave, soda) & bermuda black(rum lime, fresh ginger juice, angostura & ipa)
P eclectic tunes and a piano for an impromptu jam sess. casual alphabet city spot.
P can't get enough of the flavors here! margarita with kale, beer with red bell pepper juice - yes please, they totally work.
P i usually don't leave tips places but the bartenders/owners are so nice and the cocktails are spectacular. have them recommend you a drink with your favorite spirit!
P try the after hours jam. bourbon, apricot jam, chipotle agave, lemon, bitters. tasty.
U garden variety marg
P if you have a go-to cocktail on the menu, get that. but their signatures are dope as well.
P the linden corner is delicious. pink peppercorn! i've had the garden variety margarita in the past as well and it was pretty good but a bit intense.
U the wayland champagne cocktail
N radicchio salad...grossest thing i've ever eaten. nice staff though and cool vibe. will come back and try something different and hope it's edible.
P get the san fran sprout to start. follow up with the left hand milk stout
U tony; bars to visit
U i suspect banjo jim still haunts the piano that lives on in this rehabbed spot but the design, bourbon/apricot/bitters/spicycocktail, sausage bread with ricotta will make you drop an o.
P great beer..nice place!!
P i won my shot!!
P best check in special yet!!!
P free shot when you check in.  sweet!
P just have a good time! it's all what you want from an irish bar!
P langans now serves leffe blond! ask rachel to pour you one on a sunday morning. enjoy a side of jazz piano on the side.
P great irish coffee!!!
P ask sean the bartender what does " amina koyim " means. he will be glad...
P great good and free shot with checking ! :) thumbs up
U ask glen for his secret shot!! lol
U if you're coming to work, don't work along.  schedule a meetup on www.heretwo.com
U you're beary close to build-a-bear workshop!  stop by and see us to make a new furry friend!  we even have nyc exclusive bears not available anywhere else!
P free shot with check in!!  corned beef panini is good.
N don't eat here crappy service
N service was sooooo rediculously slow. bring your own water. good was ok. would find another irish pub next time.
N food good....awful service!!!
P mac and cheese was amazing. bartenders were delightful! :)
U you don't get to choose your free shot for the check-in special.
N bussing staff is rude.  they clear plates before the rest of table finishes eating.
P show the free shot special to the bartender and you get a free shot! don't forget to tip :-)
P shepard's pie, chicken pot pit, and the paddy burger were all great dinner selections.
P love this place! great food and service. try the mac and cheese.
P cute irish waiter!
P take a break from time square, and come hang here.
P got the free shot!!!
U someone's been hittin' the eve wipes in the bano.
P ask the sean the english bartender about the troubles in the north. he tells it so well.
P resonably priced 'comfort food' such as banger and mash, fish & chips, and meatloaf. nice escape from the nearby times square. (via scoville)
N entrée portion salads are small
U challenge bill o'reilly to a drinking contest.
N ripped us off post hurricane sandy. falsely advertising happy hour. stay away.
P good people great live irish music
U wifi code: timessq
P laura is the most amazing bartender and she's really irish and she's is so....awesome
U just used it. only standard beers bud, coordinate, etc.
P paul and mark at the bar are hot, hot, hot!!!!!
P great food! chili is awesome!
N 7$ beer during happy hour...no thx!!!
P gotta try the piggy fries! off the chart!
P great pub...our first stop after check in at renaissance
N fraud.  doesn't honor their check in special even though it's still active.  liars.  stay away.
N uh, brooklyn lager doesnt count for the "domestic" beer discount. shitty. how much more domestic can you get in nyc?
N the foursqare special doesnt include all domestic beers. don't be fooled.
U there is another pig and whistle a block before..  don't get confused.
N they cheat!!!! do not beliefe them. do nor go. they ripp you off !!!
P ommm nommm. fish & chips were great!
P you'll hear jay-z to metallica, it's not just irish. in fact, i've never heard anything irish here. still fun.
P tuna steak was delish! service decent... great, fun atmosphere!
P great place to eat & drink
P awesome place! paul the bartender is a wizard with blended drinks and neill, who speaks 5 languages, makes the best layered shots i've ever seen!! try em!!
P they don't have happy hour specials but you can split a bottle of wine in a great location with great staff for a good price. say hi to the homeless guy, charlie, for me!
P when you visit new york, you must come here for some shepherd's pie and a cocktail!
U check-in to wedew between feb 28th, 2011 and feb 28th, 2011 using foursquare for your chance to win! for more details, visit http://bit.ly/hg50nk
P stay downstairs for a rockin’ good time, go upstairs for a more romantic interlude.  go for drinks and dine on the fried brie salad or the pig burger.
P great place. homey atmosphere, good food and good drinks. go upstairs for a more quiet and romantic vibe but don't knock downstairs. it's lively and just as awesome.
U chx pot pie was really good. shepard's pie was kind of bland. not much taste to it.
U my wallet was stolen here
P by far one of the best pubs in nyc to visit. nice people, great service, clean, good music, loved it!
U don't try to ice a bro there. a smirnoff ice costs $7.50. but to me the icing was worth every penny that night.
P great place to catch a beer after a broadway show. doorman keeps douchebags to a minimum. likeable staff.
P people sitting on the benches, enjoying the wind late into the night. calm. safe. great view.
P relaxing and quiet... i love coming here and just chill
U hanna's boat!!!!!
P enjoy the waves and the wind, literally anytime. pretty safe even at night with constants security patrols.
P a great place to enjoy the great nyc down town view.
P really great ahi tuna and avocado poke, spicy!!
P great location!!!
P excelente, el checkout in fue súper rápido
U why not check out http://bit.ly/urzsma
U be sure to stop by the @netbase booth at pivot con!
U here for #pivotcon 2012? stick around 'til 6pm for the crowdtap cocktail party with baratunde thurston and karmin!
N not impressed with this hotel. definitely time for a remodel and some of the staff forget it's a service role while still giving you that "nyc welcome" known around the world...
P historic hotel. in 1964, the beatles stayed here and were introduced to marijuana by bob dylan. in 1992, macaulay culkin was once again home alone here in the hit sequel. full site history via<link>
P go see keith at the lounge on sunday's. he's awesome!!!!!
P enjoy signature cocktails at the bar to unwind.
U brasserie 1605 is one of the very few restaurants with a times square view, make sure to stop by for coffee - or more. prefer top of the rock for views & ask our teams for broadway shows bookings!
U wifi password: cpts2012
P great location,confortable and just beautiful! loved ?
N was not recognized as pc platinum, received no upgrade, benefits or even a thank you for loyalty.
N bring your own pillow and blankie
U swing by social media for internal communications conference. get social with @jwillie and talk about sharepoint
U daily deal summit in new york on april 17-18 at the crown plaza manhattan in times square
P very beautiful rooms and bathrooms!
P no minibar, but everything else is cool. i love this place
P i love new york and this hotel
P fab hotel, rooms super comfie!
N there's no mini bar in the rooms. at least not in those they put me into.
P best room service! called 'cause i'm sick and they sugessted chicken noodle soup and camomeal (sp?) to make me fel better. souper service.
U pickup point for the toy fair.shuttle
N the wifi in the room isn't that great.
P great hotel, everyone very helpful... a must if you are visiting new york!
P convenient area to stay. the quality of the hotel rooms aren't extravagant but they are alright.
P dogs up to 20 lbs. allowed; $25/night pet fee; $100 refundable security deposit. this is the place to stay with your pooch in the broadway theater district.
P perfect location, poor breakfast, 32th floor is noisy due to elevator machine, very helpful concierge
U ?? ??????? ??-???????) ??? ???? :) ?? ?????? :) ??????? ???????? ? ?????? :) ????? ? ??? ??? ????????? ))?
P tokowasa with sake!!!! yo yo
P mentai pasta...a good combination bet east and west..!!!
U mentai pasta..!!!!!
U didn't know such prices existed in the city
N nothing was that great. nothing was worth the line to get in. definitely wont be back
U wazabioktopuz!
P mentai fries, a bit soggy. kikusui sake, yes please. yellowtail collar, of course.
P it's like kokekokko of little tokyo in la, except downstairs
N izakayaa kenka is better. and whats up with the edamame??
P stumbled upon this while looking for hockey bar hagi. how serendipitous!
P chicken skin ftw!
P my lovely basement little heaven. must list: tako wasa, bonito tataki. (4 of 4 petals via fondu)
P loved the fried chicken ponzu and gyoza. stay away from tempura eel. (4 of 4 petals via fondu)
P if you want to get a table quickly, sit at the bar! the mochi special ice cream is divine!
P this is the only good place to eat in times square.
U gyoza, yakitori, mini-udon, spicy pork belly and cabbage, and sashimi tuna salad
P the best rice i have ever had! and everything is amazing!
P a hidden stairwell leads to a bustling izakaya hub, as if you fell down the rabbit hole into tokyo. pair cloudy, but sweet nigoris with takoyaki, corn dog, bacon wrapped enoki & yakitori!
P grapefruit malt drink delicious!!
P must-order items: jako salad, tuna collar, yebisu beer.
P there are 3 venues w/ "152" listed as the address, so look 4 the blk awning with "iroha" on it, enter the restaurant & go downstairs for sake bar hagi. open l8 & very affordable! usually a line tho.
P damn tasty okonomi-yaki.
P cheap 3.6: if you want a cheap japanese izakaya bar, then this place near times square is pretty good.
P ask for a rec on sake, and don't leave w/o trying the yellowtail collar and chicken skin yakitori. don't order any full entrees btw.
P yellowtail sashimi is a must, as are wagyu skewers with wasabi
N very hard to find. hole in the wall place down in the basement. food was cheap and good. place smelled like bleach. bad customer service.
P winner winner, chicken liver = winner
P must try the pork belly, simply amazing!
U subterranean times square hideaway for japanese pub fare: yakitori to udon to dried skate fin. fans include chefs dave pasternack (esca), michael anthony (gramercy tavern) & joe ogrodenek (battersby)
U konnichiwa !
U man, no wonder his aim sn's been stinkykid427 since '01
U um dos melhores points de ny
U free iphone 5 giveaway! limited time offer
N awesome new bonuses for spg gold members: hookers swarming in the lobby and a pair of soiled men's underwear covered in cigarette butts right outside your window!  you stay classy, w hotels!!!
U restroom access from theater entrance  after going up the escalator
N bartenders at the hotel bar are bitchy and snobbish. don't tip them.. maybe a dollar.
P gorgeous hotel..fab conference rooms
P very good place
N personally think w in hoboken is a lot nicer
P location is great & room service food is delish!
U se possibile chiedere camera ad angolo dal 17 piano in poi
P on my top 5 list of hotels to stay at when you are in the city. near all the major production offices and recording studios. can't forget the amazing staff, concierge, room service, etc...
P 24 hours exciting city! come to have a lot of fun!!
P times square - the best !
P there's a new interactive billboard shows crowd live. everybody swings wildly trying to dunk a character into a pool. apparently people in times square weren't already behaving erratically enough
P nye fireworks!
P gotta love the people watching here!
P enjoy the best seafood at the blue fin restaurant.
N 2 heinekins: $20... not that i would order that crap, just sayin
P this is a good pick for a stylish stay in times square. seriously, could you get any cooler than chill sushi and live jazz at blue fin? we'd recommend the cool corner and fabulous corner rooms.
P love it here!!
P best concierge service in town. whatever you need, the will get it for you
U real estate expert freenyhomesearch
P best place to meet new ppl
P get the seafood tower
U who was the genius that changed the name?? i have fixed it now.
U why was this changed from the w hotel to times square?
P check out the wired 2011 store
P peartini is sensational!
N not a very comfy bed. :-(
P best pillows i've ever had in a hotel & super friendly front desk staff, but make sure you request a floor without animals...the first night my floor sounded like a kennel :-(
N pizza sucks here. it's cold & the sauce is flavorless & the service sucks.
P pricey!! but worth it look out for todays special!!
N just not really worth it. find something else.
P pricey but worth it!
U come all the way from davenport, iowa (quad cities) to try this pizza and yes...go iowa hawkeyes!
U come all the way from davenport, iowa (quad cities) to try this pizza and yes...go iowa hawkeyes!
P get the meat lovers slice!
P get the meat lovers slice!
N it's no gino's east
N expensive as hell and not great quality go to koront's for a better deal
N super pricey, two slices and a soda for $8. slices are very big, though.
N good size slices. not all the way cooked. blah
N pizza where i am from (san antonio, texas) is way better.
N bad pizza and i'm from ny so it makes it worse. lombardis in soho is way better
N they use msg in the sauces and some cheeses. be carful if your allergic like i am. triggered a major migraine and in hospital for 5 hours with iv. mtn dew is good though.
N the special slices are good, but it's ridiculous that they'd be out of regular old cheese.   the sicilian was garbage, all spongey and not crispy at all. a little overpriced...
N not as good as the cranberry deli pizza
N they apparently don't have plain pizza x!
N besides the outrageous prices, i saw pizza boxes stacked on top of the trash cans in the back. don't order delivery
U ray's pizza is on the macy's thanksgiving day parade path! tune in and catch the lewis the duck "on the roll again" parade float presented by homewood suites by hilton.
P not bad. good size slices.
P get ray's special
N pizza is ok, but they often 'run out' of cheese pizza, so you have to buy one at twice the price. unfriendly service.
P mmmmmm good
P pizza was terrific. cheesecake rich and delicious.
P good flavor but not fully cooked...got a slice of pepperoni
N ugh.... no crispy crust....not real city pizza
P the sausage, bacon, and mushroom pizza is amazing
N too expensive. bad service. 5.99 per slice!
N sometimes they "run out" of cheese and you have to buy a $6.00 slice... not cool
P ask beatriz the owner for tips on pairing wines with recipes. it's one of her favorite things to do.
P amazing wine selection love the place dog friendly love lola
P catch a wine tasting
P ask hassan to help you defeat gargamel, as papa smurf is the wisest of all the smurfs
P give hassan a dollar, and he may show you the secret rabbit hole to narnia that has the mysterious life light of manhattan island, located under his pile of blankets in the basement.
P take the mixed platter, and some dumplings.
N portions have gotten a lot smaller, so sad.
P just north of the buzz of times square, escape into this fun asian fusion resto. start with a pile of tamarind ribs, a sticky but very satisfying indulgence. finish with one of the fresh, zesty rolls.
P the spicy shrimp tacos are unique and amazing.  must try.
N good sushi but very limited menu options, which disappointed me.
P excellent gluten free menu!
U ruby foo's can do tacos too! featuring a korean pork taco today for national taco day: korean pork, pasilla chili, cilantro queso fresco
P food is ok and definitely overpriced but to be expected from the times square location. i got the pineapple cashew fried rice with chicken which was tasty and a big portion.
U did you notice today's date, 8/8? get lucky at ruby foo's! we're giving out lottery tickets to every table in the hopes that you hit the jackpot.
P steamed shrimp dumplings are yum
N worst service ever
P the lettuce wraps and cashew/pineapple fried rice is tasty. drinks are also great!
P try the chicken and shrimp pad thai and the chocolate cake! (4 of 4 petals via fondu)
P the tamarind ribs are a pile of sticky but very satisfying indulgences. share the appetizer with a friend or go for it!
P good food , not amazing but great service!
P really good food! huge plates! i had the pad thai.. my favorite...
U help us fund clean water for children around the world! donate to unisef’s tap project by giving $1 for tap water & $2 for bottled water during world water week - march 19-25th
P the pad thai is out of this world!
P try the sushi taco trio best of both worlds! max n the staff very attentive and helpful.
P great atmosphere! great music! great food! :)
P get the dumplings. any of them. all of them. so good.
U vanessa, una de nuestras viajeras, dice que el mejor arroz frito lo comerás aquí. ¿estás de acuerdo? cuéntanos en aprendí.
U happy ruby foo's day! since you're so close to the winter garden theatre (50th & broadway), catch a performance of mamma mia! for best availability, try a 2pm saturday or sunday matinee.
U since you're so close to the winter garden theatre (50th & broadway), catch a performance of mamma mia, now 11 years on broadway. for best availability, try a 2pm saturday or sunday matinee.
U year of the dragon happens here 1/20-1/23! special menu and parties for the whole family.  more info at www.rubyfoos.com
P a l w a y s great food & service!
P ask for jeremy. he's the best server there!
U time to party into 2012! cheers here: http://www.brguesthospitality.com/group-blog/5432newyearseve2012
U happy holidays- get a $20 gift card on us, when you spend $100 from 11/28-12/12 at www.shopbrguestinc.com!
P a bit expensive and touristy, but the food is always yummy. try the double pan fried noodles!
U i've been robbed while using an atm in this mcdonalds, the guy who stole my wallet was talking to the security guy, strange, isnt it?
P the best delicous :) angus deluxe is so perfect
U around 550 million big macs are served in the united states each year.
U tourists-stay in the middle and act like they never saw a mcdonalds menu. new yorkers- go to the corner registers and have their order in 5 mins
U men's bathrooms down stairs women's bathrooms up stairs.
U i always sit upstairs by the window and see amaz ppls round the world..... pricele$$
P mmmmm hazelnut iced coffee
N they stir your boiling hot oatmeal with a plastic spoon. so yes, it's slightly less poisonous than nearly everything else on the menu--and it tastes great--but you're gonna get cancer.
N don't come here for the restroom. the line is about 10 men always. can't imagine what's happening at lady's rooms
P make sure to go upstairs and check out the model.
N the fries in this location don't taste as good as other mcdonald's.
N i didn't like the fries when i got here, and i've been to a lot of mcdonald's.
U caution: men's restroom is downstairs & women's is upstairs!
P try the oatmeal not only is it healthy it good too
P breakfast platter is nice
P check the handmade model of ny on the second floor.
P angus is the best!
N it's new year's 2012 in times square! check out our website for the official news, schedules, faq's, & everything you need to know about celebrating nye in times square! http://www.timessquarenyc.org
U passing clouds & chilly weather :/wa zefzooooooooooooooooooooufi :djust out from mcd, so coffee or beer??....
P mcdelicious breakfast! ask for: mcgriddles with sweet bread, without sausage, with orange juice.
P pick any breakfast, add "without bacon", & enjoy a halal food =d
U ??????? ?????? :)
U ?????? ?????? :)
P sit upstairs in a window and enjoy the view!
N don't use the restroom over here cause the line to it always long
P dollar menu is where it's at.
P it's best place to hide from the summer rain when it attack u in times square ;)
N too many ghetto and crack heads smh
P cool spot to eat. the have tv's in the back
U es mcdonalds, si, pero estas en times square. ¿qué importa lo demás?
U east village – $15.95 aycd with brunch menu items
U @skrillex call me if you wanna do afterhours on my rooftop w/ an epic view chinatownnyc-operation cupcake i gave you a blue zippo 6463692095
P not to shabby of a tap selection.
P 1/2 price jameson shots and $2.00 corn beef sliders
P philly steak sliders ftw
U east village tavern158 ave. c (at e. 10th st.), new york, ny 10009(212) 253-8400   @evillagetav   evtnyc.com
P a real who dat bar!!! pull for the saints with killah buffalo chicken sliders and wash it down with a abita.
P it's a saints bar for adults!
P new orleans saints sound and music every game day.
P best place in nyc to watch the saints!
P try the sproles. request them fried, not grilled. best sproles outside of connecticut.
P mac & cheese + pulled pork sliders = delicious.  good selection of craft beers.
P come in for who dat sundays!
P large selection of beers at good prices. can be a little bit hit or miss, but they sometimes have some great finds on tap. the bar food is appropriately delicious and decadent.
P when we were still working on foursquare out of my apt, this place was where the very first "pop-up tip" actually worked ("at ev tavern? try the fries!") that's when i knew we were onto something good
U be boys with gary the bartender and the local old guys.
P the best american craft beer selection on avenue c, but beware: this place abruptly turns into a dance club on weekend nights.
P hooker watermellon ale.  so nice for summer!
P check out evt for the cheapest brunch in town $17 gets and entree with a 1hr open bar.
P get the quesadilla. your taste buds will thank you
P try the nachos. you won't be disappointed.
U tuesday night trivia starts at 8pm!!
P check this place out, best craft beer in nyc, food is good, and you just might see me at the corner of the bar...
P awesome brunch! $15 for great choices!  unlimited selection of drinks. get the burger!  bartender awesome.
N not truly open for all early morning world cup games. don't believe the message on the answering machine!
P if you want a danceoff this is the place..
N the bartender rocks but the rest of the serving staff sucks. the waitress just told me she could not get me a beer. lame place.
U shoot the billies, not the nannies
P thursday nights are half priced lobster rolls. only $7 for one of the best lobster rolls you can find in the city.
U $4 drafts on sunday afternoon during the street hockey season (april through october).
P bottomless cocktails at brunch. i love the barrier reef benedict that comes with crab cakes instead of biscuits / english muffins
U east village – $20 aycd with brunch menu items (cash only)
P try to be seated in the back garden area with a big group for the all you can drink brunch. well worth the wait!
P unlimited drinks!!
P very affordable beverages and lots of space. come back here.
P better fish & chips than portobello road
P all you can drink specials on a regular basis.  can't get any cheaper than that!
U sit in the back yard and know that they will (very nicely) ask you to leave shortly after you are done with your meal. they only take reservations of 6+, come early on the weekends.
P hottest bartenders in the 'hood. hands down.
P endless brunch has got to be one of the best all-you-can-drink deals in new york city, but the lines are really long. definitely make a reservation so you’ll be guaranteed a spot.
P ask to test the "moo...juice"!! might be your "thing"!!!! yums!!!
P fucking. awesome!! music!! bitters!! australia!! music!!!
P all you can drink brunch!
P 21 and drunk?! yes.
P great food. great people. great vibes. the 80's playlist and unlimited brunch make it easy to return again and again.
N no more drink specials!! only open thurs-sun. :( boo!
N food was decent but the service left much to be desired.
N i think the bar stools are deliberately uncomfortable ... bring your own ...
U aycd brunch ftw! the flank steak is also quite good.
N all you can drink is no longer an option unless you have a large crowd.
P try the burger with the lot - enjoying one of my fave burgers in nyc for @idlehansbar staff holiday party  (via @foodspotting)
P $20 bracelets - all you can drink for 2 hours on the weekends!
U sunburnt sorority cows
P kangaroo sheperd's pie and shark pesto. yum!
P burger with the lot is awesome.  it may sound strange but it is not at all - super good!  also, on wednesdays it is 5 bucks!
U sticky day !!!
P all-you-can-drink mimosas, greyhounds, and bloody marys with brunch. super cheap, a little divey but good for a large group.
U make reservations to save yourself the wait
P the $20 open bar for 2 hours is awesome. small place, but the service is friendly and the bartenders are cool - tip well.
P great food and service!
U hi dear, how are you today? i want to talk with you, it is important. write on my email address (balindasamawa@yahoo.in) for details. god bless you. your new friend, princess balinda.;
P great food with portions more than anyone can eat.  appys were delightful.  chopin martini was excellent recommend stuffed veal chop.  everything was perfect.  the restaurant is right on the bay.
P a little bit if italy in patchogue. great looking and friendly ownership. must come back and sample menu
P we always get free parking on the street, great view of the bay!
P great friday happy hr..4-7
U forget about it for tonight... unless you are traveling by boat!
N the self parking is nonexistent, but don't  worry the valet guys will accost you while you're on the street!
U the first spring long island restaurant week 2011 is april 3 -10. come here to enjoy a 3-course prix fixe for $24.95. see other participants or make a reservation at www.longislandrestaurantweek.com.
P food is fantastic, portions are large. wait at the bar can take an eternity, even when its not busy. waits can take forever, so try for a reservation. parking can be tough too.again, though. the foo
N lombardis....the service is horrendous. the staff is outrageously unfriendly. the wait for a table outside is interminable. the bottom lone is that this place requires new management.
P awesome turkey club
U speakeasy bar above this place at 151 ave. c
P super friendly staff and i hear they deliver!
P excellent bacon, cheddar burger and great fries. take out on davis park ferry to fire island
U coconut fried shrimp at the bar
P delicious food at a very good price.
P waterfront burgers and wings.  awesome combo.
P the fried clam plater is a must!
P i heard the mayor here is a real stud ;)
U zombie apocalypse 10/29 10pm-1am. xtreme bowling, zombie cocktails, desserts, shots, screening of classic night of the living dead, & 2fer pints of beer! reserve a lane now, the apocalypse grows nigh!
P every sunday from open to close games are only $2.50 per person/ game!
P this is my bitch!
U tonight at bowl long island we have the ufc fights going on with 2fers all night and a lot of food specials! it all starts at 9pm at bowl long island!
U sayville is money hungry. more bowler friendly here.
P best bowling alley ever. reasonable rates and great price on blue point beer. $13/pitcher !
U closed due to hurricane irene damage
N you can see time square from here. wouldn't recommend it. ether.
P such an amazing view of times square!!
P great view of times square. i love the toast with manchego and honey. generous pour of wine when ordered by glass. plus 4square deal 50% off to a max of $20! use it!
P if you've ever wanted to levitate over times square, this is your spot....dim, sexy, killer views. who knew there was someplace so classy in this part of town?
P shhhhhh.. my secret hidden happy place. people watching + lobster rolls.. mmmmm
U there is a limited blue ribbon menu!
P a hidden gem. one of the best views of times square
P the potato chips are beyond a bargain at $.99!
P an oasis above the fray.
P nice rooms need a little updating on the room wall paper and carpet but nice trendy hotel.
P one of the best views of times square. great place to get a cocktail - and easy to walk to from the marriott marquis.
P fabulous spot to enjoy a cocktail... and soak in the times square scene!!
P very nice whiskey pours, but a limited selection.
P come for an early lunch and enjoy a gorgeous view with minimal crowd noise
P best view in times square
N terrible service. go with friends.
P great view! bring all your friends to this lounge!
P best kept secret in town! amazing views of times square
P most gorgeous view of time square. a great escape from tourists, the lounge is cool classy, and celebrities frequent.
P highly recommend the amante picante cocktail- if you're cool, hip, and "with-it".
P great place to get drinks before or after a show on broadway. view makes you feel like you are in times square.
P searching for a blue ribbon fix? this is your spot in times sq. great views of the bow-tie & great food to boot. get the chicken wings, any slider, the mini lobster rolls, and grilled cheese panini.
P the blue ribbon classics make my heart sing.
P great view i'd times square. very relaxed atmosphere and very cool! expensive!!!
N be careful....you can make reservations at open table....but they don't honor them if they are full.
P cuban society is pretty sweet. order with caution.
P try the bloody mary
P stacey!! she's awesome. if i ever come back from maryland i want her to be my bartender. she's pretty cool
P one of the cheapest option for lunch at the trap tourist times square.
P cool bartender upstairs
U aaammmoooo !! um de meus lugares favoritos em new york !!!
U order one entree to split with two people.  fill up on bread and salad.
P delicious salad and bread and amazing meals. se for brasileiro, procure pelo garçon também brasileiro leonardo.
P black tie mousse cake :) sexy time in my mouth !!!
P pumpkin cheesecake is to die for :) yummmmm
P five cheese ziti !! amazingly yummy ! definitely a must try !
P white peach cooler non- alcoholic . it's sweet and tart ! #perfection !
P breadsticks are on point..
P try the chicken marsala - simply too much!  (via @foodspotting)
U ótimo restaurante e no coração da times. tem uma mesa no segundo andar que fica de frente para o burburinho ;))
P this is a nice place 2 go 2 and eat supper, they have the best salad and breadsticks in all of nyc.
P get the never ending pasta and the castello moscato!
P this olive garden doesn't advertise the 9.95 unlimited pasta bowl special but they will honor it. just ask your server.
P love the moscato wine, a must. i gues you already know that the salad is superb.
P some rude peeps but sue was awesome!!  everyone who wants a friendly outgoing bubbly gal who delivers great service, ask for sue!!
P five cheese ziti, simple and exquisite.
P ask for wonda she was a great server!
P really great frozen drinks
P shout out to dave.  you're the best... great shots....
N 40 minute wait?! don't come here hungry on a saturday night!
N 40min wait?! don't come here hungry on a saturday night!
U péssimo atendimento. comida razoável, ou seja, preço justo. depois das 22h30 fazem tudo para expulsar o cliente....mas com um pouco de paciência vale a pena.
N horrible service. the food was not as expected.
N service is so bad ! run away from this restaurant...
P ask for a window table,the view is very nice
U comida muito boa.
N 40 minutes  wait? it's not worth it, seriously.
U beware the bone zone.
U we love jw indy!
U boom. mayor here too.
U mayor asher > (former) mayor ellen
U mayor ellen > mayor tim
P the theater is very beautiful, but it's old (build in 1912) and has limited restroom facilities. be sure to visit a restroom before entering the theater.
U go see grace! and donate to aids research.  michael shannon is masterful!  just an fyi-go to the bathroom 15 minutes before! only 3 stalls on lower level (theatre is very old)
U ???? ??????????
U there are two lines but no one seems to know, so everyone just waits in the really long one. just walk right up to the front if u have your ticket and go right on in.
U ????????? ?????????
U ?????????????
U ???? ????? ??? ?????
U ??? ???? ?????
U grace begins tonight!
U no love no heart i'm rock
U no love no heart i'm rock
U get your tickets for "grace" asap! major celebrities in this one: paul rudd ("anchorman"), ed asner ("up"), & michael shannon ("boardwalk empire).
P gorgeous place
U whts ur best sport
U i hv a studio also am perfoming on 18 september,yuu d gr8t mrs keyz*sow proud of yuu!
U have great day
U ur music is nice
U yes boss is friday.
U drink your sippy cup of wine through a straw
U i love alicia keys music
U ni de noche ni de día.
U cielo merida a estudiar
U stick fly begins previews nov 18! find out more at theateradvisor.com.
U stick fly, the new broadway play produced by alicia keys, is coming to the cort.
U you might think you would not like anything broadway..try it,open up your mind you will love it..
P this is a special theatre on broadway - it opened in 1912 & shows like fences, king richard iii & one flew over the cuckoo's nest have graced this stage. i'm excited that stickfly will be the next!
U there are more women's restrooms upstairs. ;)
N few bathrooms. potty before you get there, and avoid liquids during the first act if you don't want to miss the show.
U opening night isn't far away, so be the first to write a review on theateradvisor.com for born yesterday! be heard!
P don't miss time stands still. it's fabulous
U new years eve 2013 at  monday, dec 31,2012 08:00pm
P totally recommend this place. had lots of fun meeting people singing karaoke.
U new years eve 2013 at monday, dec 31, 2012, 08:00 pm
U tonick4daasol
U singingndareign
U huge party tonight!! join the bar-top bandits upstairs for a crazy-fun bash starting at 10pm ;)
U check out www.nogamesent.com
P happy hour drink here kick ass!
P the chop salad is amazing. get it for the lunch special when the resultant is fairly empty.
P waitstaff here is awesome.  jack daniel's is also pretty good here.
P an easy, effortless drink. ask the bartender for a bulldog and tonic, plus a dash of lime.
N service sucks! food sucks! typical blah times square mediocrity!!! don't waste your time or money!
P awesome food!! amazing calamari!!
P go upstairs!!
U join me for our karaoke party every sun, mon & wednesday night! i'll be rocking the mic on the bar-top & mixing up some delicious cocktails throughout the night ;)
P great bar in theatre district go to the upstairs bar not as crowded. their happy hour rocks! good selection beer on tap.
P buena musica, buen servicio, variedad ;)
P great sports bar... great drinks decent prices .. karaoke on sundays
P one of the best bars in times square - great place to get a beer and hang with friends.
P omg the kareoke will change your life!!! (course i'm from canada ;)
P want to hear some world class singing? come after 9pm . the karaoke is off the charts.
P be on the lookout for grant wahl, he's known to bell-up when in nyc
P make sure to check out the 2nd floor on friday nights! good vibe, great music! tell them that eric of law sent you for reduced admission
U come in to watch the new era pinstripe bowl and enjoy $4 drafts and $5 cocktails from 3-8 p.m. on friday, december 30
P riazul tequila margarita is amazing and great price too!!!
N service is rude wings aren't that good.
P tonic has good music, food, service, and they show sports on the tube - what more could you want?!
U tonic bar & restaurant is on the macy's thanksgiving day parade path! tune in and catch the lewis the duck "on the roll again" parade float presented by homewood suites by hilton.
U don't be that guy who does the 10 minute song in karaoke.. no freebird, stairway to heaven or 5 minutes of na na na na's in hey jude please..
P prices are reasonable during brunch on sat & sun.
U post your review on any of the 30 city/state theatre chat groups on facebook.
U they censor your mail & throw out what they deem "junk mail". helpful or not helpful?
U really? i'm gonna mayor this.
P fantastic and fun instructors
P stop here before newport.
P great coffee with a manhatan view!
P eric is rocking the most epic curly 'tache this morning!!!
P additional seatings available at the rear of the store and offers a nice view of the marina.
P my daughter loves their madeline biscuits
P try the sausage, egg and cheese sandwich - love it! (via @foodspotting)
N slow... long lines & slow service..
P pumpkin spice latte.  love.
N had to give the order 3 times and then forgot to make my brother's order. i understand it gets busy but...really?
P open 24 hours on weekends.
N lemon pound cake required a reminder to be given to us. caramel frappucino was bitter as tasted different from those at the other outlets. service is slow.be prepared to… (2 of 4 petals via fondu)
P one of the best views available from here. a great place to catch up with friends or with the book you love along with a delicious mocha latte n sweet potato chips!
P try apple fritter .. i like it.. sweet enough and filling for a quick bite and studying for  extra 2 hours ..
U the hot chocolate season s back!
U one of the barrista girls got great sexyy b**ty..juss sayinn.. :)
P very nice spot - lots of characters to watch!
U say thank you & vote for "my starbucks idea": integrate social thanking into the current starbucks iphone app. click on the "read more" link & vote!
P awesome "coffee by the river" setting!
N forget about sitting here for 15 minutes while having your coffee.  internet parasites ocupy all the tables... as usual. probably for hours...
N reserve a spot outside on one of the benches. you will probably not get a place to sit inside. the seating area also stinks a bit.
N at least the shape of this place is conducive to lines, because that's all they have here.
P the baristas here are great. kudos to camille, jennifer, aj and alex
N recently out of the starbux brand soymilk constantly. the supermarket brand doesn't taste the same :(
P ask for "fake betty" to make your drink. he rocks the bar!
U the line is always taking forever. but the staff are friendly.
P pickup a coffee here and start the walk viewing manhatten across the hudson river waterfront to reach hoboken in 10 minutes. awesome walk-way...
N never get any sandwiches here. i tried both veggie options on two different occasions. wasn't good at all, i threw it.
N once ur decaf has been caffed, u get wary :-/
N no decaf iced coffee :(
N #estebantip: don't order burgers because they won't sell you one.
U farewell my people, it's been a good run. i hereby bequeath my mayorship to...
U pass through in stealth mode, it makes people wonder (^_^)
U use channel 72 vhf smd if no answer try 16
U buy 1 tasti, get another 50% off! coupons will be available at tank shows this summer and fall (coupons are only valid at tasti d-lite times square at 1588 broadway.)
U pick up a coupon at tank shows summer and fall 2012!
U hop-off at stop #1 for tasti d-lite’s low-cal, soft serve dessert treat! show your gray line new york ticket & receive $1.00 off any item at between december 5-16, 2011. times square location only.
N the free offer says 1.50 off any smoothie but they dont have smoothies. jamba juice here i come
P fabulous staff. great social media presence
P creme brûlée flavor is the bomb.
P dangerously addictive :)
P try a tiger beer 'tallboy'!
P great place // very chill // great drinks... start with a yardbird.
P brilliant interiors, cocktails and music. the owner, christian, is a great dude. highly recommendable.
P try the senor buck- delicious drink with help from ninth street espresso, mmm.
P love the yardbird. beauty in a glass.
P yardbird ftw
P ass pocket o whiskey, front pocket o gin
P love it... a hidden gem
P lovely place! interesting cocktails. the michelada was quite delish!
P get the supertide! 50% of sales go to helping the les rebuild after sandy. also, you want to coffee and tequila shot. ask christian.
P get the southeast watchtower. you won't be disappointed.
U adult soda?
P awesome new spot, amazing cocktails at great prices. a new favorite!
P previously a strange, but interesting dive bar. now stripped, and completely redone into another cocktail bar to further popularize the ave.
P ask for a cathee. you won't regret it. or...
U the mayor is gorgeous and fairly young ;)
P wifi is good
U the 3g sucks round here..
U taxi service is available to davis park ferry co. or walk to watch hill ferry terminal.
U buy the lirr patchogue village package to get off-peak round trip rail and a coupon for savings at participating merchants.
U blueberry gelato and passionfruit tea!
P their milk teas are their premier menu item. but their food such as the wings and fries or wonton soup are delicious
N $2 tuesday gelato is no more :'(
P love this place!!! ccxiv
U chicken teriyaki dumplings fried!!
P try the bubble tea (via @foodspotting)
U add babo on facebook and ask to be added to the group to get notifications for special promotions and be entitled to a free drink of your choice on your birthday! http://www.facebook.com/effyeahbabo
U coconut  smoothie
N smoothies (especially gelato) are so over priced.
P chicken lemongrass dumplings have become my favorite here.
P fae is the best!
U free boylan soda (grape. lemon. rootbeer. cola) with every purchase of an asian burrito! (chicken or beef)
N stupid tea house.
P good food you just want to make sure you call in your order..since they make everything fresh it takes time.
U tuesday special: any large fruit teas or milk teas for $3.21. smoothies and milkshakes are not included in this promotion.
P mona is the best.
P biscoff and condensed milk waffle w/ vanilla chai tea latte (:
P i'm always craving curry pork cutlet. favorite rice dish here (: and the apple pie and bon bon gelato is banginnnn!
P love the tofu nuggets! even better in a wrap
P get on that boracay!
P mmm peanut butter gelato. try 3 for free!
P try the tea/coffee bubble tea with the tapioca balls, very refreshing.
P coconut traditional hot tea with milk and honey along with a condensed milk waffle <3
P try their gelato! it's delicious.
P mmmm sunburst tea is awesome!!
P you have to try the dragonfly blend, its the best
P spicy fish balls, yum!
P beef noodle soup is good but sometimes inconsistent and salty
P tsunami & boracay are my favorite flavors!
P waffles with nutella yum! for bubble tea if  cold i usually get lychee if hot i go for almond.
P beautiful view of the hudson
N this place makes me want to vomit. why do i keep coming here?
N don't visit here. it sucks
P roast <3's brickhouse !
P best bar on long island
P try summer buzz and nitro boom stout... 2 great beers! - and yummy blue point oysters from the raw bar!
P great food.  good apps.  try the streetlight beer or blueberry ale.  decent music.
P good friends, good times, and lots of laughs! if you don't mind the sometimes crowdedness of this bar its always a good time!
P the chili is spicy as hell! don't do it!
U wild karaoke night thursdays
P try the oysters!!
P try the oysters!!!
P try the main st coffee porter.
P some people actually like this place . . .
U burger and a beer for $10 on wednesday.
U this is me drinking.
P get a growler of the j&j triple belgian! you won't be disappointed. it is going fast!
U tuesdy night, it's country karaoke with amy and leanne.
P try the broiled mahi mahi on rye toast with remoulade sauce. it is excellent.
P definitely try the hurricane kitty with the philly pizza.
P thursday is ladies night...$3 drinks for ladies
P hans gabali in the back
U the beer is good, but the food is mediocre at its best...
P try the double vision belgian.
P a pint of stout  and a bowl... of chili
P try the decent music nights
P try the habenero bbq chicken wings (via @foodspotting)
U have a great pumpkin
N place is boring beyond words. ordinary place with an ordinary atmosphere. nothing interesting going on.
P do plan on having a great time , drinking great handcrafted beer , and listening to great new music!
P annemarie is the greatest bartender ever!
P ¢25 wings monday all day!
U the brickhouse octoberfest , saturday september 23rd. live german music , food , and the annual cutting of the hops.
U super nice staff and has pool tables + jukebox. but meh drinks, divey and empty. this is where i'd go if i didn't want to be found or were wallowing. (1 of 4 petals via fondu)
U salsa dive bar
U it all over at 3:30am (friday).
P great bartender and you can smoke!!!! real speakeasy!
U the password to get in "go poli,go vito"
P say hi to vito (sp?), smoke ciggs (because you can), play pool, use the jukebox, and drink spanish beer.
P obsessed with the hot dogs here. staff can be pretty slow and the line can be long, but truly awesome hot dogs! get the green tomato relish. the coffee rocks too.
P get a toasted marshmallow shake and wander around times square.
U kiosk restaurants on the rise in times square http://exm.nr/skfm9s
P small beach park with a great view of the bay.  small dog park but also perfect for alone time.
U use caution around the south east end of the park, as the remains of old dock has some large sharp, steel nails protruding outward - which at one time kept the dock together.
N unfriendly staff and breakfast is awful. my room was a decent size and clean.
P low for free wifi ;)
P we love the aspen social club. when we just can’t take city living anymore, there’s no better escape than a pine-framed, antler-bestrewn lounge with a fire pit.
P i could live w/ tiny shower & floor space & "external" closet. love the price, location, comfy beds & aspen social food
P dope fish tank!
P i love the fact that each room has a doorbell :)
U get connected! free wi-fi + outlets available.
P really grest hotel
U saturday, october 29th, 201 9pm - 4am3rd annual halloween bash for the lodge of horror with dj zeke thomas at the super trendy aspen social! 1 hour vodka open bar 9pm - 10pm
U kamarnya kecil banget, tak ada lemari baju, cuma prime location utk turis - 10 langkah ke times square. deket jg ke ktr prinsipal.
U wifi available to guests and public in nice lobby seating area -- and in the aspen social club next door.
P best location you can imagine but small rooms! don't even get a closet! but then again, you can't have it all
U lo mejor del hotel la ubicación. está junto a la 7ª avenida, cerca de times square y brodway. lo peor puede llegar a ser la insonorización.
P excellent service, especially from dennis & anna.  great stay.
P great spot, dennis and anna @ front desk will take care of you.
N my room is mighty tiny. even my bedroom at home is bigger. oh, new york.
N found someone else's leftover sandwich in our room. don't consider bringing many clothes as there's nowhere to hang them. it's a rip off.
U chambres de merde trop petites et crades. mais proche time square. ;0)
P not just a place to stay, but a cool place to stay. kaleidoscope styles, all brightly lit; exudes a space age-meets-ski lodge vibe.
P rooms are nice and clean and service is ok. free internet in the lobby, 10$ per day in the room. double room from 100€
N super small rooms and very dark. probably not good for old people.
U revisad muy bien las condiciones ( tasas, recargos...) sobre todo si reserváis por internet.
P hotel recomendable. muy cerca de times square. wifi gratis en el hall
P good hotel for a very reasonable price.  well located, a few blocks from times square square and close to the subway. the bar is simply amazing!
U if you get a room on the second floor, nancy reagan them with just say no.  the bar pumps the bass until 2:30 a.m.  amazing place otherwise.  great light switches.
P barnyard classic with pickled jalapeños.  meats and cheeses are great for entertaining (try the roaring forties blue if they have it). awesome and knowledgeable staff--same owners as brix on 9th. win!
P i'm obsessed with the barnyard classic.
U please have some old amsterdam cheese next time you stop at murray's cheese shop-- we produce delicious aged gouda, find out more here http://oldamsterdam.com/
P great sandwiches. get the barnyard classic with avocado on rye bread with a fresh watermelon juice.
P the hibiscus iced tea here is great.
U mexican cubano!
P if you're looking for something light and yummy, get the figgy piggy. so good!
P sandwiches are pretty great, reasonably priced for all fresh ingredients. the bread they carry is pretty slammin' too. (3 of 4 petals via fondu)
P love the vito sandwich!
P kevin and alex are super helpful. i have never gone home with a cheese i didn't like.
P the soups are delicious and make a nice light meal.
P the vito is awesome!!! get it toasted with chipotle mayo!!!! :) !!!!
U american hero. meatball sub. meat lasagna. coconut macaroons.
P go for the "sexier beast," composed of house-roasted beef, farmhouse cheddar, tomato, greens and a fruity touch of pear mostarda, an enthralling melding of flavors.
P tons of delicious sandwiches, especially if you love cheese.  right around the corner is their wine shop, brix.
P awesome subs :) !!!
P great empanadas!
P the mexican cuban tops porchetta as the best pork sandwich in the ev.
P magic powers and rainbow rays
P vito= heaven.
P homemade dream bars are yummy!!!
P meatball parm hero :)
P best cuban sandwich in east village, great cheeses, little pricy, great staff
P try the empanadas and a pasta salad for a stress-free tasty dinner.
P the bacon is crispy and perfect
P be eco-friendly, take a reusable bagwww.projectgreenbag.com
P best real chicken sandwich in all of nyc!!
P such an awesome cheese case.  and great macaroons, of course....
P amazing sandwiches!
U apparently danny macaroons scones are getting people in alphabet city laid...  buy some and see what they can do for you....
P older crowd at the bar but decent drinks.  looks like a good place to eat.
N the lobster roll sucks. people who enjoy it have obviously never eaten a good  one.
P this place is legit, go there, eat, and have fun.  i have lived in the area for 7 years and never went there until a month ago and now i have been there twice.
N not a very good experience staff is being very nasty
N very crowded nasty waitresses and no one wants to go out of there way here to make u feel good
N try to avoid
P jimmy buffet, good food, good friends... can't beat it!!
U how am i still the mayor with 2 check ins ?!
U the first spring long island restaurant week 2011 is april 3 -10. come here to enjoy a 3-course prix fixe for $24.95. see other participants or make a reservation at www.longislandrestaurantweek.com.
P get the lobster roll!
P take a walk, enjoy a beer and take in the views of the water with friends.
P execellent food and entertainment any day of the week during the summer!!
P great food... better service!make sure you enter through the front door, otherwise you'll get lost.if on outside deck; ask for the bug spray once the sun sets.
P by far the best customer service i've had. erick is an amazing concierge especially if you're trying to check out nyc nightlife! sharea the night manager is the best!!!! enjoyed our stay!
P the nicest staff, gigantic rooms for midtown manhattan, amazing boutique feel, terrific location and you can barely hear any noise from busy times square. would stay here a million times.
U stop being such a self absorbed snob craig l.  "nothing for elite this and no this...  whine whine whine."  if you are so "elite" -then go pay for a breakfast!
P rlounge shows you all of times square, plus 99 cents homemade chips and dip - best deal in ny
P if you order a side of bacon with room service... don't listen to the guy that tells you it's only 3 or 4 slices. it's more like 6 or 8!!!
U welcome to renaissance hotels! for some great local finds — from restaurants to shops to more — visit us on www.renhotels.com. live life to discover.
P try the lobster rolls appetizer in the rlounge.
P go to the r lounge and have the amazing chips with green onion dip for $0.99!
P the view is amazing & the food is good in the rlounge.
U you can get 3.5% cash back now when you sign-up for bigcrumbs rewards program and then reserve a room online here or any other marriott brand hotel using your account.  see link for more information.
U you can get 3.5% cash back now when you sign-up for bigcrumbs rewards program and then reserve a room online here or any other marriott brand hotel using your account.  see link for more information.
P go to the lounge and get a drink looking out over the madness of times square.
P great place to stay. amazing view of times square. you are literally right on top of times square. the tower of lighted billboards is this hotel.
P order delivery from giavanna's pizzeria.  great food! 201-372-0555
P r lounge has an amazing view of times square.
P brass fixture in bathroom. grand.
P the food is  great but  the elevator when you land you have to go to another elevator
P love the boutique hotel feel, great service and so close to everything!
P great breakfast for elite members in rlounge on weekdays.  amazing times square view to help you wake up.
P great location and service. ran into bruce lee grandson - matt.
P if you're lucky, you'll run into jack clark in the rlounge.
P the blue ribbon classics menu items are awesome.
P there is free breakfast and free wi-fi for elite status
P grilled cheese panini is fantastic...  hot water doesnt seem to reach the 18th floor though...
P great cobb salad in the lobby lounge with very friendly staff
U there is no concierge lounge here or free breakfast for marriott elite status customers on the weekend.
P check out the rlounge. awesome view  of times square. they have a dj on thursday nights. very cool copper decor.
P having dinner with a good friend she is so sexy jijiji
P perf location for new years celebratioon to watch the ball drop.
N to access a room on the 7th floor, you first need to go to the 8th floor and then use the internal stairs.
N swing by social media for internal communications conference. get social with @jwillie and talk about sharepoint
P first day back from a long weekend!
U rainy day? get lunch & 20% discount without leaving the building at brasserie 1605 (hotel lobby. up the ecalators)
U check out the ama bookstore on the 8th floor for loads of great business books.
U no visit to the hershey's store in times square should be complete without getting your hands on some scharffen berger chocolate!
N a very small shop. m&m's is in front and by far is much better.
P want to buy the world's biggest reese's chocolate? come here.
P this is a nice place 2 go 2 and buy some hersheys chocolate.
P they give you a free cindy bar when you check in on 4square #sweeeet
U puroo esbelto entraaa aqui?
P it's so good, it's dangerous!
P chocolate!
P surprisingly it smells like chocolate on here!
U hersheys needs to stop discriminating against hiv positive people!   hershey trust don't be cruel - let the child in the school!
U faça seu check in e ganhe uma barra grátis. :)
U "the more the better" burda da i?lio mu? :/
P nicest employees ever! very helpful!
U since you're so close to the winter garden theatre (50th & broadway), catch a performance of mamma mia, now 11 years on broadway. for best availability, try a 2pm saturday or sunday matinee.
P who doesn't love this place?  i'd send them away. good eats.
P twizzlers!!!!!
U it's new year's 2012 in times square! check out our website for the official news, schedules, faq's, & everything you need to know about celebrating nye in times square! http://www.timessquarenyc.org
U delicias y decadencias!
U el sr de la maquinita llena los valdes con chicolates, impersible el show
P gotta love the smell of chocolate in here.
P they gave out cookies 'n cream coins upon entrance!
P get the huge chocolate kiss in silver
U allahim beni oraya geri gonder
P be sure to check out the world's largest hershey's bar!
U avoid hershey's until it remedys their failing labor track record and finalize a fair contract with their workers.
P you can smell the chocolate from broadway as you walk by.
P i love just the plain old hershey bar..it makes me smile
P biggest reese cups ever. go and buy them, put them in the freezer, and then enjoy a slice of heaven.
U check in @ "find your best friend at the geoffrey tron" -find a best friends volunteer in a blue t to find out how you can get an ipad 2. sat 6/11 12-3pm only, 44th & broadway! see ya there! :)
P smells sooo good here!! so many great options here!
P perfect for kids with play area and easy waves.  no rocks.  good snack bar, can finagle your way out of the 5 dollar fee by parking in the neighborhood across the street!
N please don't use the beach as your ashtray!!!  children play here!!!
N the beach is not an ashtray.  although this one sure looks like one.  really such a shame since the close proximity of the playground to water make it perfect for parents!  :( the water is dirty too.
P nice beach if you can find a spot to park
P awesome food
U the branzino is done well and not too dry. unlike the bread!
N steak and eggs, not the best. steak was too dry and eggs were over-cooked.
P they serve kobrick's coffee here!
N the mojito is a pina colada on the rocks- bummer. the whole purpose of a crisp summer drink down the drain :(
P the sangria is delicious
N this place really needs a dedicated lunch menu. the grilled chicken sandwich is great, but i don't know how many times i can have it... (also, kind of hard to eat as a sandwich on such crusty bread).
U wi-fi network: skylark wi-fi password: skylarkjc - via 4sqwifi.com
P the new york omelett is yums. ralph is an awesome waiter.
P the short rib is to die for!
N veg noodles suck big time.
P there is a pond in the very back and lots of little nooks to call your own for a moment.
U please pick up your trash when you leave.
P takes me back to my youth.
P surprising tasty
P def hits the spot for a late night craving after stopping at summit.
P great food at great prices. if you are in the area it's well worth it.  best to get here before weekday crowds at pre-12pm for no wait.
P shoyu ramen is the way to go. take out  takes less then 10mins, even during peak hrs & busiest times. cash only.
P $11 meal deal (2 small mains) totally worth it
P check miso ramen from set menu. the restaurant has serving for 38 years and renewed interior as well as all menu. very cosy and dishes are so much better!
N used to love this place but it has gotten very disappointing. i work around the corner do get takeout and the ingredients in the ramen have changed, decreased or disappeared.
U pakko ramen is gone....
P when you can't wait an hour for totto ramen.  food isn't life changing, but it's fast and tasty.  old man makes me laugh.. always energetic and friendly.  cheap, cash only.
P best ramen in the city. all other ramens  cower in awe, limp noodles quivering in meager broth, a single slice of pork sinking shamefully to the bowl's bottom. (p.s. no credit cards)
P best dumplings in the city
U they stopped serving curry ramen! i have been eating at sapporo since 1997. bring back the curry ramen!
P great local find!  i will be back next time i'm in the city.
P chicken katsu curry ftw
N cash only? are we in 1995?
P award winning gyozas
N 4sq recommendation.  went with high hopes. chicken was extremely dry. asked to replace dish. manager had a very awkward argument w/me about my request. embarrassing. will not return. mediocre food.
P sushi that glows
P so pretty, they decorate the food so amazingly, its tasty and well priced
U happy hour from 3-5pm everyday: $2.50 on sapporo and $1.50 for the second round!
N beware: their yaki-soba does not actually contain soba (buckwheat noodles). and their gyosa have trouble staying closed.
P try sapporo special and put in an oil that's so good.
N dont come here.... trust an asian.
N yes, this is definitely an authentic japanese restaurant, complete with mexicans in the kitchen.
N please don't tell anyone about this great noodle place!
P try the sapporo miso ramen - ramen craving when it gets cold.  (via @foodspotting)
P try the spicy kimchee miso ramen (via @foodspotting)
P the curry seems that it has nothing inside, but it's beef and vegetables all melted.  sooooooo gooooood.
P try the pork katsudon - love this place. (via @foodspotting)
P try the tsuke men with dipping sauce on a spring day. the temperature is just right and they give you a pot of hot broth to wash it down at the end. perfecturo destne!
N they don't take credit cards. seriously? catch up.
P sapporo special pork miso ramen noodle are great!
P tucked away near scaffolding but next to tompkins square park is some great coffee. always strong, aromatic and with a nice crema. some space for lingering, standing or seating but plain inside.
P the only good coffee & the only good workspace in the area, along with free wifi, quality espresso & a basic baked goods are provided to a mostly local alphabet city crowd.
P the only good coffee & the only good workspace in the area, along with free wifi, quality espresso & a basic baked goods are provided to a mostly local alphabet city crowd.
P the espresso here is top notch.
P very nice spot and a very nice neighbourhood. i recommend it.
P wi-fi is free, and you may see jason schwartzman from bottlerocket there. he lives nearby.
P love the ave. c location for working/reading on a weekend. some of the best coffee in the city.
U wifi pw: 700east9
P a bit off the beaten path, but definitely worth the trek. our vote for the best in the city. cash only!
U wi-fi network: animalfarm wi-fi password: nce10009 or nse10009 - via 4sqwifi.com
U wi-fi network: animalfarm wi-fi password: nce10009 (or) nse10009 - via 4sqwifi.com
U wi-fi network: animalfarm wi-fi password: nce10009 - via 4sqwifi.com
P superb coffee as you'd expect from a place that's been here doing it for 10 years. love the minimal/rustic feel too.
P perfection
U 4mbps d and .55mbps u
P get to know the baristas. if you are in a particular mood, they can create custom drinks for you, but nothing like starbuck's. this is real technical coffee brew.
P you can ask mark to make you a caffe ole, with skim milk and it costs leas than a latte and tastes just as nice.
U wifi and that front porch is clutch. holla at ya boi if u in, kuz i'm upstairs.
U don't make the same mistake i did and make an appointment to meet someone at "ninth street espresso." there are two locations nearby!
P get the cappuccino, for sure. hands down one of the best espresso bars in nyc. barista truly knows what she's doing!
P amazing mocha!
U hipsters only please.?.
P the ginger cookies are even better than my grandmother's. sorry granny.
P this location of ninth street has free wi-fi and ample space to unpack your laptop and hunker down for a bit. a great rainy day spot to warm up with a coffee and get some work done.
P order an iced tea, they're not advertised but they're great!
P owner ken nye is often credited as the first person to bring serious coffee to new york city in 2001.
N warning: celebrities, notably jason schwartzman, have been known to receive preferential treatment here. if your barista is dawdling with your latte to favor his, tell her to "rush more."
P the red eye here is really strong...get it if you must stay awake!
U free wi-fi
P grab an americano and a friend and enjoy
P try the sushi rolls (via @foodspotting)
P the tuna tacos are freaking amazing. you won't be disappointed
U skip dessert it was awful. stick with simple sushi, get drunk and enjoy the view.
U 2012 create a roll contest finalists have been named! order one of these specialty rolls and receive a $2 discount when you vote for your favorite!
P this place is the best , service food everything, don't mind giving them extra tip.
P the brown rice sushi is delish! (4 of 4 petals via fondu)
P there's something special about the crepe with chicken. a japanese spin on brunch with the perfect mix of savory and sweet.
P not only does the food at komegashi too look good..it also tastes good! ty ku is proud to present a line of premium sake & spirits that can boast of the same!
P it's not in their menu but try their creamy nirvana roll. yummy!
U manager the @komegashi too - newport made a stink over free japanese chicken wings to-go w/ 1st #foursquare check-in ($6.50 value)...bad customer service!! all server was great though.
U $2.50 domestic beer for happy hour (4-7pm).
P try the banana froster - yum (via @foodspotting)
P try the oyster shooters - yumm wish there was more  (via @foodspotting)
P one large asahi, served ice cold, will make your day.
P nice view at the back. try the godzilla rolls and fried green tea ice cream.
P i'm always here for their sashimi lunch... juz like this place for it's simplicity!
N probably worst and most stale japanese food i've ever eaten. their unagi was absolutely rubbery and disgusting. sashimi was like eating fish out of the hudson. i couldn't down more than two or three b
P the spicy lover roll & spicy white lover rolls are great!
U like komegashi too on facebook and be the first to know of special events, dining deals and more!
P cool ambience. more energetic than the ambience of it's sister komegashi. check out the after-work crowd.
P love this place specially at lunch!
P although on the pricey side, sushi and sashimi here is great, and view is nice as well.
P great broiled hamachi neck and volcano appetizer.
P need a sushi fix tonight - great view from here!
P nice selection ,
P rastafar rye. excellent.
P sample what sounds interesting and go home with a brewery fresh growler of your favorite. good times
P entitlement porter from the white house recipe.   very nice for liberals and conservatives alike!
P we can't wait to try brews from blue point brewing company at village voice's brooklyn pour craft beer festival oct. 6 in brooklyn! http://ow.ly/dmqn5
P jess is the best bartender ever
P try all of the beers. they are great. i love the oatmeal stout.
P jugs at night
P stop by for a tasting, you won't be disappointed. a lot of variety.
P first 3 samples are free! i love their blueberry beer and for something different the black & blue- blueberry+oatmeal stout.
P try the sour cherry stout. absolutely fabulous!
N they now charge for samples :(
P had an awesome time for my first time here yesterday!   come visit my girls heather and  erin!!!  great bartenders!!!!
P try everything, you won't be sorry.
P delta session blues is awesome!!!
P parking is in the back, go from light to dark during sample tasting or skip the lights entirely and head straight to "toxic sludge" and "no apologies", some amazing beer
U blue point brewing company will be sampling beer oct.15 at the village voice's brooklyn pour craft beer festival!  check out more info at our website: http://ow.ly/6nnid
P pick up a growler!
U this long island brewery, open since 1998, serves free samples in their tasting room and holds great annual events, like a cask festival every april and an anniversary concert each august.
U no apologizes needs to apologize
P spring fling and oatmeal beer are fantastic<3 sat beer tour are at 1pm and 4pm!! definitely go check it out! the tasting room is a bit small though.
P i'd say try a certain beer, but it's pointless. you seriously have to try them all.
P blueberrry beer!!! mmmmmm.
P fall = pumkins. get the pumpkin. you wont be disappointed.
P toasted lager by far the best!!
P the sludge. strong, dark beer. looks like a glass of coke. try it. its good !
P excited to try sludge...its flying off the shelves!
P if your lucky enough to be there for the 10th anniversary ipa, make sure u get it...
P local microbrewery with free tastings thursday - saturday.  get a black and blue, blue point blueberry mixed with oatmeal stout is amazing.
P have a nice cold blueberry !
P the rastafar rye is incredible and so far my favorite
P although they don't deliver it's the best takeout in the grand/metropolitan/graham area. get the pad thai, it's greasy and delicious.
U hours: 6am-10:45pm mon-fri    6am-9:45pm sat    7am-9:45pm sun
P if you're there on a friday, get the west coast shrimp wrap!
P delicious split pea soup
N they've changed their coffee cup sizes & the "large" is now actually a medium & they charge the same price. total ripoff!
U $5 credit card minimum!
N the people serving the food are very nice and friendly. however the 2 cashiers are not only unfriendly they are extremely rude!
P check out hoodoos when they play
P try the full rack of ribs (via @foodspotting)
P bobbique is always a good time. constantly changing fantastic craft beer selection, good food and live music. my favorite day is sundays! football, beer specials, slider specials, all the games on!
P yummy food, decent tap selection.  go when the southside players play :)
N was fun, until the bartender cursed us out.. just for being a bit noisy, no manners
N rude bartender is rude. don't go here.
P great beers. the bbq shrimp is great.  i like the shrimp and ribs combo.
U makes me peeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
U i guess you have to work here to be mayor.
P this place flat out kills it!! the  tap selection is endless and the food is the goods !!!
P not a wine or sangria joint , strictly off the charts hops and chops
P take a load off at the bobbique.
P the bartender phil is so sexy
P but the shrimp is great!
N beware of the corn bread. not too good
P sample the great tap selection, or peruse the bottle menu.  it's all good!
P great spot to watch a football game.
P come visit
P try the wings, the best ive known
P ask for jack. best server there!!!
U walk in on a patron pinching a loaf in the no-walls-or-stalls men's room.
P ribs are amazeing
P greenpoint kelso industrial ipa. . . ill be here till its kicked
P get the pulled pork sandwich! great beer selection too!
P get the fried shrimp and fries basket. the shrimp are fantastic!
P love the wings!!!!
P best sweet potato fries around...insane!!!
P good food and cold beer.
P the wings are insane, if you don't try them you should be locked up.
P the wings are crazy!!! i co-sign them all day, also get the fried pickles. the beer list is one of a kind, 300+
N this place used to be good but they can't seem to keep a consistent menu and what they offer now is mediocre at best. not to mention the inattentive service on a slow night. i understand why its empty
N great view! food taste like shit and the african manager is a dick
P right on the water... so beautiful!
N wanted to dine at this establishment but the marina was too small to be able to dock my yacht. they need a larger marina.
N wow.  awful wouldn't do this place justice.  chili's across the street would be considered fine dining in comparison.  run.
N avoid.  or make sure your fish is properly deboned!!!  yuck!
N wild mushroom parpadelle, not really 'wild'.i only saw one mushroom. and the entire dish tasted exactly like the instant lipton noodles you buy at the store! and the mushroom burger equally as awful!
N nice view - but the service is incredibly slow...
N on first check-in i never got my appetizer after asking about it multiple times.  just a heads up. i did however receive my free drink.
N food was only ok.  i was expecting something better.  we were seated in the corner away from everyone else and with no view.
P the white chocolate bread pudding. you won't be disappointed
P great spot with great food. ask for the chef's special if you want some good food that's not on the menu!
N they advertised a free drink if you checked in. they denied me after a few of my friends went. said its only for regular business not parties. false advertising! if you can't afford it dont advertise!
N the waiter argued with me that prosciutto and soppressata were both cheeses !
N food here is okay.  view is nice.  but some of the waiters are absolutely clueless.
P ask for the special mussels and the creme brûlée. amazing!
U farewell my people, it's been a good run. i hereby bequeath my mayorship to...
P best view of the hudson!!!
U just added a manager special!!!   shout out some idea's of what you would want.  thanks for stopping by.
P love it!! great spot! and yummy wine soooo goooood!!:)
U do not bring your boat
P i love the live music, more restaurants should have this.... also the food is great!!!
P order the italian nachos... awesome!
U there is a free social gathering here today ( may 21) starting at 6pm ... just incase if anyone is planning to join....
U last time i saw this much turquoise i was in orlando
P great place to eat during summertime
P awesome  area with beach nearby as well as awesome flow dogs and cheese fries
P what a great traditional summer outdoor luncheonette. staffed by local trenagers eager ti give you good food. and yes the calamari are excellent
P great fish and chips plus the beach is right down the block with parking available ....such a nice place to check out!
P western burger is nice and spicy and sooo delicious.  great atmosphere for an afternoon brew
P great wraps.......especially shrimp croele
P they make a good fish & chips and the fried calamari is excellent. ? ?
P awesome lobster rolls. great place to grab some brews as well
P they make good flounder sandwich.
P such a swag spot.
P love the revived main street.  definitely a nice looking town!!   plenty to do if you like dining, entertainment and shopping.  find properties for sale at: http://www.cbmoves.com/ronkonkoma
P patchogue is pretty big. the mayor may be here but i haven't seen him. lol...
P enjoy revived main street
U it's square....................
U as festive tree-lighting alternative to rockefeller center, join jersey city for their annual tree-lighting ceremony. enjoy festive lights and free treats. find out when on metrofocus
U they are doing the holiday lighting @ town sq no. sure check out!
P very cool view of lower manhattan.
P totally gorgeous with the christmas decor. take pictures!
P newport does holiday lighting right. worth checking out.
U check under the bed
U check under the pillow for a mint ;)
N uh.. i was drinking a smoothie here and found a plastic piece inside it. i complained about it but the person told me that it's okay to drink that..... uh... thanks...........
P have the five fruit frenzy!
P cold buster!
P orange dream is my favorite drink! i would recommend it!
P orange juice is made on demand. ask for a large one!
P protein berry work out with whey:)
P the seasonal pumpkin smash is the business!!
P the smoothies r the truth
P orange dream machine!!!! yum!!!
P pink starburst and white gummybear (mango) are amaaazing flavorss
P as mayor i say, "try the apple'n greens! get your fruits and veggies on!"
U peach pleasure
P tropical mango!!
P yum, white gummy bear! shhh! it's a secret....
P carribean passion!!
P strawberry surf rider. need i say more. #winning
P mango peach topper!!!!
P the coldbuster is a must, even if you don't like bananas.
P there's a 'secret menu' with awesome drinks like 'pink starburst' and 'chocolate covered strawberry'. they're both awesome!
P strawberry surf rider all the way!
P try the banana berry
P mega mango wins.
P order pink starburst. one of the many flavors from the secret menu.
P not so many juices - orange and carrot only. the rest are smoothies.  all put smiles on faces though :)
U wednesdays are $2 oatmeal days.
P strawberry energizers w an extra energy boost. life-sustaining!
P mmm love the strawberry whirl! healthy and great!
P perfectly chocolate chai tea latte with soymilk, wow this was delicious!
P don't have oj immediately post wheatgrass shot. the acidity just cancels out it's benefits. wait 5 minutes.
P get your healthy drinks here. hot chocolate not so much!
U if you're wearing nets gear, you're probably a hipster
P i live here. it's chill.
U here’s your chance to boost your negotiating skills and career advancement tactics at “women in action”, a complimentary panel workshop and business networking event.  select “more info” to rsvp.
U join us for the reinventing management for the 21st century event on march 3rd, 2011 at the university of phoenix jersey city campus.
P the grilled veggie platter was awesome! the staff and crew always do the right thing! great place!
P feels like a dinner, not a bar. usually has some sort of live music on the weekends. not my first choice in patchogue, but cheap beer specials and lack of a cover charge are always good things.
P marianthy is the best bartender ever, the fries are so good and the beer is cheap. i like this bar.
P try a razorback
U 2 dollar pbr's!!!
U starting today from 9-11 thursdays 50 cent budlights
U starting tonight 9-11 50¢ budlights love it!
N when you come with 9 people it takes like an hour to get your food. no joke.
N full of idiots
P get the chicken parm sandwich... with marinade instead of marinara. they did it by mistake to mine and it is awesome!
P the vip wings are the best
U photo: workmen laying trolley tracks outside in the early 1900's, at the link! snap a pic of the intersection now and send your "new view" to @nydailynews on twitter!
N $25 minimum for #cc. and service sucks.
P the bouncer adam is hott!
P marianthy is the best bartender ever!
U there are 2 new turtles in there now, zippy and zoomy, both red-eared sliders! claude has friends!
U say hi to claude the turtle! you might catch him sunbathing on the ledge of the pond or swimming with the  goldfish. love him!
U look for claudius the turtle.
P you can bring food and have a yummy brunch with friends under the grape trellis. they also have a bbq. just remember to donate to the volunteers!
P moqueca is phenomenal
P with live brazilian music every night, sublime mojitos, and a surprisingly painless check at the end of the meal, esperanto is an awesome ev spot!
P meet zoey, the manager, she's great. also order the sombrero--awesome margarita
P live music thursday nights!! 1/2 off wine on mondays. nice brazilian vibes
P ceviche =  yum. but the spiced olive oil that comes with the bread = amazing.
P a dinner to share (for two). start with mixed empanadas and then get a moqueqa (regular size) with sides of cilantro rice and pao de quejo. drinks: caipirinha.
N got bit to hell by mosquitos at the bar. i have 14 bites!
U mushroom croquettes were amazing. chips and salsa...no...just no.
P nice escape in a fun & super chill setting. great food, cocktails and live music during brunch.
P brunch, the caipirinhas and pretty much everything else about this place are amazing
N worst service i have ever had. ever.
U beware of the pitcher! the best items are the huevos rancheros and spanish omelet... tbc
P really delicious food. coconut seafood stew is awesome. they don't muddle the limes in their caipirinhas. nasty.
U do the feijoda!
P one of the best hidden gems in alphabet city (a hidden gem in of itself).
P one of the best brunch deal in manhattan in the daytime, live music and south american meat in the evening, friendliest staff... what else are you asking for ?
U friday is not the weekend!!!!!!
P guava mimosa. so good!
P monday is half price wine!
P great food.
P the $7 ceviche is not only a great price, it's sharable and filling!
P the moqueca bahiana is huge and has remained my favorite thing on the menu for 7 years! two people can share the small and three can definitely share the large! be sure to top it with farofa!
P try the deadly, but delicious, caipirinhas.
P get the feijoada and passion fruit mousse! made me feel like i was back in brazil :)
P always a party and caiperhainias by the pitcher! flan is super good, too.
P eggs benedict & guava mimosa are awe-inspiring!
P the quesadilla del mar is like a brunch orgasm. other option would be something where you get the amazing potatoes. plus for only 10.99 it's a winner.
N the manager is super rude.
P weekend brunch is unbeatable!
P you have to try the strawberry martini, trust me!
P try the lobster bisque (via @foodspotting)
P ask your server about our skuna bay salmon specials throughout october, for national seafood month, plus $1.50 oysters at the bar every night after 9:30.
P best egg white frittata on the planet!!!
U join us for live music 7 nights a week starting at 6pm and $1.50 select oysters after 9:30pm at the bar.
P great oysters also, very good for restaurant week.
U $1.50 deep cove oysters all day today for national oyster day, and $5 muscadet by the glass at dinner when you order a half dozen or more oysters! we shuck, you savor...enjoy!
N been sitting at the bar for ten minutes without being served or acknowledged. have come here before but probably never coming back!!
P great breakfast.  defiantly ask about drink prices.  a 2 oz pour of bulliet rye cost me $15 but it's time square so what can you do.  scrambled eggs and bacon were awsome.
P try the hamachi maki - watermelon, arugula, jalapeño and hamachi. amazing combination.  (via @foodspotting)
P great pre-theatre spot although sometimes its a little touristy.  spicy tuna roll is awesome!
P get a glass of torrontes and watch the world walk by.
P seafood is fresh. crab cake is amazing. (3 of 4 petals via fondu)
P one of my favourite restaurants in ny. nice atmosphere with live jazz music. delicious seafood. try the halibut, very nice dish.
P the sweet and spicy roll is terrific!
U good food. very slow service
U help us fund clean water for children around the world! donate to unisef’s tap project by giving $1 for tap water & $2 for bottled water during world water week - march 19-25th
U come by on st. patrick's day saturday- feast on corned beef & cabbage specials, sip a cold beer, be entertained by irish dancers and enter our “ pot of gold” raffle for prizes
P tuna burger is legit. go for it.
P one of my favorites in nyc
P emery is very hot and personable.  j.p. is a pretty cool dude.  go upstairs and and relax.  the molten chocolate lava cake wasn't too molten, so try another dessert.
P a drink before a show
P lobster bisque mmmmmmm
P the west side sushi roll is absolutely amazing. get the wasabi cream cheese on the side and dip it in there. also, the sesame crusted tuna is awesome with the lo mein noodles. awesome atmosphere
U since you're so close to the winter garden theatre (50th & broadway), catch a performance of mamma mia, now 11 years on broadway. for best availability, try a 2pm saturday or sunday matinee.
P try the lobster bisque, yellowtail shiso roll and valrhona chocolate pot the creme.
P lobster cocktail, spicy tuna and maguro tuna sashimi are all a must order!! great atmosphere too!
P lobster cocktail, spicy tuna and maguro tuna sashimi are all a must!!!
P tried the cocktail there...the "blue fin" (go figure) it was good
U celebrate the season with a christmas cheers here with the whole family.  we are open 7am-9pm on christmas day!
U time to party into 2012! cheers here: http://www.brguesthospitality.com/group-blog/5432newyearseve2012
P ask the barista for their specialty!
P cold brew coffee is glorious, but easy to mess up. roast does it right.
P if you are a coffee drinker, you owe it to yourself to try roast's coffee as a french press. utterly delicious and addictive.
P roast makes really good coffee. i drink mine black, and they make a well balanced brew. not too bitter and not too weak. if you like full bodied and rich ice coffee, get it done tiffany's way.
P almond mocha is delicious! currently one of the barista's choice.
P never been here, but my friend and his band play here.  live music
P great ambiance, awesome staff. support your local businesses!
P the french toast latte is amazing!
P don't underestimate the value of the teapot ;)
P great coffee went to the open mic night had a good time.
P try the zzz tea, iced!
P congrats on your win for best of long island's win for best coffee and best coffee house for 2012!!!
P marble mocha macchiato is my favorite! warm or frozen!
P patchogue has such a diamond joint here :) come down on open mic nights. so much talent and good times.
P pomegranate lemonade. amayzing.
N seriously!? i'm actually not gonna buy any coffee from you just because of that weak-a$$ 10% discount...@ least 20% would be more appropriate...
P delicious coffee , tell tiffany and david i said hi !
P when i've finished traveling at the speed of light, i grab a iced americano.
P now that you have got a bit of caffeine in you , come visit down main street for a delicious pint at the brickhouse brewery
U stop in on roasting days and roast your own to take home.
P best black and white mochas!
P have the small one make you a white espresso (equal amounts espresso and pumps of white chocolate)....mmmmmmmmm
U look for bridgehampton national bank across from stanley's furniture or you'll miss the store.
P great pumpkin pie latte
P ask the barista what is new. they always have a good latte that isn't on the menu.
P dirty chai latte (chai latte with a shot of expresso)
U part of it is open. (had some damage from the hurricane back in aug of 2011).
U closed as of 9-11-11
U tweet your show-related questions to #askpivot to get an answer from our social experts.
U hire nyc digital strategist:      denmark francisco                                 (http://www.dsfnyc.com)
U city lights recording studio has a neve vr 60 recording console in farmingdale, new jersey to keep all of quad studio's clients that are on holiday at the jersey shore in the mix!
U sean paul makes hits here
U november 30 1994, tupac was shot 5 times & robbed in the lobby of quad recording studios in manhattan by two armed men in army fatigues. he would later accuse sean combs, andre harrell & biggie smalls
P fab location and very good size rooms unlike the rest of manhattan.
P great views from upper floors
P upper floors have the best views. especially rooms ending in 01, 02, 03!
N the price for breakfast must be a joke
U when driving here from lincoln tunnel come down 5th ave then left on 47th st. park at icon garage on left between 6th and 7th avenues.
P on the higher floors you can see times square!
U somehow don't seem to get that as a diamond member i don't like arguing for things like "highest floor available" or "breakfast eligibility"
U the lobby wi-fi is free for anyone. however, actual paying guests have to pay $12.95/day if they want to use it in their rooms. :p
U hi~~~~~ good again
P love the halal food nearby!
U rainning in the morning...
P nice place
U when you go to check out the doubltree's indoor pool, make sure to use your senses to check for signs of a healthy before diving in! http://bit.ly/freestrips
P nice location
P good and main manhattan location
P freaking awesome
P checking place
P good location
U be sure to tweet that you are at @doubletreetimsq !
U since you're so close to the winter garden theatre (50th & broadway), catch a performance of mamma mia, now 11 years on broadway. for best availability, try a 2pm saturday or sunday matinee.
P gotta love the cookies.
P very nice rooms,front desk and maid staff very nice.....no free wifi and breakfast prices are a joke
U hotel com boa cama limpo custo beneficio muito bom,e principalmente , muito bem localizado
U this doubletree suites is on the macy's thanksgiving day parade path! tune in and catch the lewis the duck "on the roll again" parade float presented by homewood suites by hilton.
P i had some friends come into town and they had heard the stories about the "mini" hotel rooms that new york city is known for. not wanting to splurge for a suite at the marriott they stayed here.nice!
U $252 nightly rate for two guests during the holiday season when you buy with your yp rewards card!
U for the on the go city traveler. this location has a guest bathroom on the lobby (3rd floor). they won't tell you, but if you bare all the way to the right pass guest check in, you'll find it
U having a room facing times square sacrifices the space of a room that doesn't.
U the internet in the rooms is only wifi, if you prefer to connect a wired connection ask the front desk staff for a wireless bridge. plug and play!
P even if you're not staying here, feel free to ask the staff there for tips/directions. nice people.
U run! run fast!
U jerry jam 5.1
P try the broiled salmon - wow!  broiled salmon with asian sesame soy drizzle and seaweed salmon. mouthwatering! (via @foodspotting)
P try the swordfish - pan roasted swordfish served over vegetables and rice. nice and juicy with lots of flavor.  (via @foodspotting)
P try the manhattan clam chowder (via @foodspotting)
P the duck was awesome!!!
P foods awesome! and the drinks are really good. dark and stormy voodoo bucket and corona with the shot of bicardi limon are some of my favorites!
N went on fathers day and we were very disappointed... poor service and food quality .. lesson learned !!
P very nice love it excellent food
P best bloody marys, fish tacos and lobster rolls are a must
P try the calamari app with the baby bok choy!
N the caesar salad is good but taste's a little like moth balls
P great food, friendly people. can get very crowded. try the seafood bisque. it has a little bite. if you're in for a little nosh, ask about the sandwich of the day.
P excellent service
P the bartender was nice and prompt w/ service. the food looked good from what i could see. i didn't have any. maybe next time.
N asked to sit inside, hostess said only outside available, asked manager and she sat us inside, hostess told manager we never mentioned the inside. food better be good
U expect to wait and calm your nerves, if you. can't then that means you need more meds than you came here for!
U muy buena musica ! .. full soundhound
U closes at midnight on fridays and 1am weekends
N worst store in times sqaure
N it's new year's 2012 in times square! check out our website for the official news, schedules, faq's, & everything you need to know about celebrating nye in times square! http://www.timessquarenyc.org
N join us on september 8th from 6-11 as we celebrate fashions night out. not only will you be able to browse and shop our fall collection, we’ll also be serving tasty treats courtesy of the treats truck
P nice selection of leather goods.
P beautiful ceramic watches and vintage inspired jewelry.
P best manhattan view ever!
P best manhattan view!
N service was marginal.  cheesecake to share and die for.  coffee is horrible.
N beyond rude. made us wait then wouldn't serve us because we only wanted coffee. avoid at all costs.
N terrible deli. there is no heat in the place and the food is overpriced and overcooked.
P fried macaroni and cheese and cheesecake is a must!
P try the tuna sushi (via @foodspotting)
P must have cheesecake!!!!!!!!!!
N the burger was good, the fries old... all pricey. the kicker: waiter insisting for 18% tip and told us that's what we should do! horribly rude and thought we didn't know better! don't go!!
P fine, the individual pizza is perfect to share
N if you don't have the lunch/dinner, u won't be allowed to sit on the big table. it's really bad.
N don't go! really expensive, bad service and the waiter insists to have $8 tips for a $50 bill!
N the food is pretty decent and i suppose you get a lot for your money. but charging $7 for 2 people to share a dish is robbery. but it's times square so i guess it's expected.
N turkey burger was pretty good.  partner had the carved turkey sandwich. he liked it. over the top prices.  the waiters are typical nyc rude.
P the new york swirl is to die for!
N pizza is a bad idea.
N corned beef was dry and turning brown. rye bread was also drying out. while you shouldn't expect much from a times square deli, carnegie is still a better choice.
N food was good. waiter takes forever. bad atmosphere. maybe i'll come back. wasn't thrilled
N don't go! dirty bathroom, serves wine in liquor glass and everyone is madd if they serve you! stay away!
N don't go! dirty bathroom, serves wine in liquor glass and everyone is made if they serve you! stay away!
P cheesecake is a reason to visit roxy!!! blueberry one is fab!!
N this place blows. avoid at all costs. overpriced, shitty service, and horrible atmosphere. money better spent elsewhere!
U no volvería al lugar, nada de lo que pedimos fue bueno
N bad food and bad service
N awful, avoid at all costs.  anything fried has an awful bitter taste, most likely fr
U bring lots of money with you
N this place was pretty bad, huge portions for huge prices! unfortunately you will leave most of it uneaten!
N not impressed, just got baked goods/pastries to go (canoli, black & white cookie, lintzer cookie...). the  lintzer cookie was the best of the trio
P cheesecake rocks!!!
U don't dress warm.
U roxy's delicatessen is on the macy's thanksgiving day parade path! tune in and catch the lewis the duck "on the roll again" parade float presented by homewood suites by hilton.
P this place is a must
N had the nastiest cashier! he told us there were no waffles! how could there be no waffles ? everyone else was getting waffles!! boo.
P red velvet latte is amazing!
N i always used to go for their misugaru shake but i've never experienced such horrible staff service. out of the 6 times i went this summer, they screwed up 4x. haven't stepped inside since.
P i love their book store , music and environment - like an asian hipster place as an alternative to starbucks in midtown
N the espresso here is watery and flavorless. prepare for disappointment.
N iced tea lemonade should be called iced tea lemon juice. when i asked for simple syrup i was pointed toward the powder sugar. no.
P they have tons of electrical outlets here!!!!! almost two for every table!!
P the staff improved from the last time i've been there. get anything misugaru! latte and the frappe tastes amazing.
P sit in the library in the back and regale other academics with your thoughts on the most recent episode of "downton abbey"
P try the dark walnut waffle with a spanish latte. amazing.
P sit in the back. it's like a library.
P service not the best but has free wifi and lots of room to work.
N typical korean business... take money, don't care about customers, and will be closed within 2 years.
U ???? ???  ???????. ??? ???  ????? ??? ?? ?? ??? ???. (???????...)
U beautiful place, good bakery goods. service meh
P seems that they have only one person trained on how to make espresso and they are rarely around. love the misugaru latte and waffle with goat cheese so that's a plus
N nice looking place.  horrible service.  slow. overpriced.
N what a bunch of money monger dbs here... no sense of customer service, no class.
N beware of the roaches!
P i always love the atmosphere here--though their cranberry almond misutgaru frappe tasted terrible... i'm assuming the baristas aren't that experienced. the cafe's fairly new anyway.
N skip the line. i never say this, but the ridiculous waits make starbucks a better choice
P "the iced americano ($2.25) is incredibly strong without tasting burned. the maple leaf latte ($4.35) is sweet without being sickeningly so, and if you get the right barista they will even draw..."
N unbelievably ghetto staff. awful food. unfortunate, times sq location that doubles as a rest stop for tourists. at the very least, the interior isn't too bad. free wifi
N a great place to go if you're having an existential crisis, since the verdict will probably be... no, you don't exist.
U great review of caffe bene: http://gorealto.com/blog/?p=131
N say a prayer if you need wifi in the library area.
N absolutely the worst customer service of any coffee shop in america. great coffe, but you've never seen so many staff do so little, so slowly. manager must be the biggest a hole on the planet.
P so many snacks and beverages to choose from! one of our favorite places to grab coffee in the morning!
N coffee sucks,  waffles small and over priced. staff in la la land...
P this place is great. wifi is light speed and you can work here - tables and lots of them. starbucks beware!
P lucky is the backbone of this place - she's absolutely incredible, especially when you're stressed out about a sick pet.
P doctor cohen is very patient and nice to my cat, who had to undergo surgery here. thanks to everyone who works here!
P this is a great vet for dogs and cats.  highly recommended
P this just became my favorite place on long island. classic movies projected onto a brick wall, awesome sound quality, pizza, nice bartenders. it's perfect. i'm moving in.
P great venue. good sound. nice selection of beers on tap.
P awesome venue with great sound.
P the pizza here rules. if they're not cooking in house, head to delfiore's around the corner. the same pizza, by the slice!
P this is a sick venue. they didn't skip a step when creating this masterpiece. lot's of details. clean, hip, and there's a pizza bar to the left when you walk in. i could live here!
P sick music venue...a must do!!!!
U go to the garage to make flower/food deliveries
U headquarters of multi-national bank morgan stanley. known as a conversative, "white shoe" firm, it's suspected ms still has a large role in the global financial crisis & ongoing eurozone crisis
U don't do insider trading
P an outdoor terrace on the 4th floor offers breathtaking views of times square, as does the observatory deck on the roof.
U i agree with jim
P i found this place to be good, different than most
N after read the tips i only had courage to order a panini. and, it's was ok. in a place where you can eat anything-anytime, nothing can be so good...
N the worst place ever have in ny.
N came when it was slow.. was sat & waited over ten minutes to be greeted by the same server who sat us. food- just okay for the price. server only checked on us once & employees were sitting & texting.
N awful food. awful bathroom. awful waitress! do not eat here!!!!!!
N great food, horrendous wait.
N don't expect any refills on your drink, and if the place isn't busy the staff will hide or watch the tv. food is good, over priced though. enjoy.
N this place is horrible. walk away!!
N the worst onion soup ever! ( if you could call that a onion soup...)
N worst food ever! everythng was unorganized. soda was flat.& my cobb salad was way over priced.my lettuce wasnt even green.&they gave me mayonnaise for my dressing so my sald was ruined. never again...
P nice place
P the buffalo chicken sandwich and the salumi panini are fantastic. great vibe with open walls to the activity of the street.
P this place just needs help! not only is the service slow but the food came out wrong and to the wrong table.  yes please put the food on my table that someone already touched. that's just love.
P easily the best cheesecake in nyc!
N the mozzarella could taste more fresh for the price.
P the grilled cheese is life changing
P happy hour all day! aaaaammmmazing! tell lana hello
P nice environment, good service, decent enough steak for times square, definitely a good, inexpensive alternative to some of the pricier steak houses
U brix doesn't work nights anymore. goto famous dave's (47th and 7th) sunday to thursday for him.
P hot chocolate isn't on the menu, but if you ask they'll give you one. enjoy! perfect for a chilly evening in times square.
N worst crab cake i have ever had. all bread. no flavor.
N no atmosphere considering it's location. not classy enough for the high prices, service was poor. food was average at best for the price.
P the phillipino waiter is super duper awesome!!.
N the wait staff is highly incompetent...learn your fucking menu && drink specials idiots!
P best cocktails from brix
P great martini's
U this place is still for tourists...
N the day after irene...you get the feeling this place cares about money not people...i wouldn't go there for a meal unless for some reason you are a tourist forced to be in times square.
N horrible desserts. tasted like the grease smell throughout the place. sent them back. my date was feeling daring so he got a replacement that tasted horrible too. we had to pay for it
P you're never fully dressed without a smile.
U great show if your not sitting by a screaming kid
P got $40 lottery tickets with 8 different people and we all got tickets in the front row together! yay annie!
U it's cold up here in the balcony!!!
U i'm here. don't y'all worry
P yay annie!!
U check out our black friday sales and class schedule!
P some of the friendliest staff ever....don't hesitate to ask them any questions...
U open 24 hours monday - thursday.
P if you want a good trainer, hector and carlos are great!
U sing with father duffy with nybt.info!
P try the andouille stuffed berkshire porkloin  (via @foodspotting)
P everything they have to offer is delicious! go there, you'll be glad you did!
P rye guy is awesome!!
U tuesday nights are open mic night hosted by ryan and tom.  if you come down for a meal, the best server in the entire world will take care of you!
U tuesday is open mic night hosted by tom gronenthal and ryan murray!! 1/2 price blue point taps 10pm-close!! open mic starts at 9pm!!
U thursday is taqueria night- $10 gets you 2 tacos of your choice & a can of craft ale.
U pick up all the shit
U the "plays" line is not always faster! if there is a long line at the play window and a long general queue, you might be better off in the latter, where there are more windows serving more people.
U free iphone 5 giveaway! limited time offer!
U ?????? ???
U come here to get all your musical & play tickets. you can usually get 50-70% discounts for same day tickets!
U there are a lot of bogus tips being shared here! for official information check out www.tdf.org/tkts or download our free app!
U holiday shopping starts now! ride for free on the shuttle bus to westfield garden state plaza! daily pick-up (9:30am, 11am & 2:30pm), now through 12/24/12, across the street from madame tussauds.
P cheap prices, lines aren't that bad, 20, 30, 40, or 50% off broadway/off - broadway shows that are available.
U download the iphone/ipad app for real time update of the shows availables. discounts change everyday (one day could be 30 and the next 50)
U the line for the non-musical shows is in the west side, only booth 12! save some time. (those shows have a "p" on the boards)
U if you go at 5:30 and want to see a play, they may say it's just one line, but ask up front and they let you in to the much much shorter play line
U se pretende ver um espetáculo, compre sempre os ingressos aqui no dia do mesmo já que eles oferecem desconto de 30% para espetáculos comprados no dia!
U it's pronounced tee kay tee ess
U pls know what show you want when you get to the window....for everyone else's sake! download the app. look at the board. whatever it takes.
U go to the downtown brooklyn or south street seaport booth for much shorter lines. also, you can download the app to easily see what shows are available.
P you need to have patient. the discount tickets are worth the queue.
U perkins eastman, choi ropiha, and pksb architects designed the ticket booth, resulting in an efficient, functional and award-winning piece of city architecture.
U perkins eastman, choi ropiha, and pksb architects designed the ticket booth, resulting in an efficient, functional and award-winning piece of city architecture.
P the tkts booth is a great way to get discounted tickets. try to get there early for better seats!
U 50% on available shows!!
U since you're so close to the winter garden theatre (50th & broadway), catch a performance of mamma mia, now 11 years on broadway!  get 2 for 1 tix now thru 2/4 using broadway week's code: bw2012
U bought a metro card recently? hold it over your head and announce you have a metro discount and you can cut the entire line!
U play express line is shorter if you want to skip a musical.
U if there is a long wait, jump on the 2,3 train and get tickets at south street seaport.
U download the tkts app to for an up to date listing of available shows.
U official tkts patron services staff wear tkts uniforms and badges. they will tell you the truth, and they promise not to sell you anything!
U pack a shoe box. learn more at www.shoeboxblitz.com
U keep waiting to get the best prices....
U just got 2 tickets to rent for $99 buck! love it!
P i don't know what i would do without tkts.if you want to see a top broadway show,have friends come in town at the last minute, and haven't reserved your tickets,this is the place to go!half-price too!
U hop-on the downtown loop right behind duffy square on 7th ave btwn 46th & 47th streets.
P great apartment. stunning views of the manhattan skyline. if you can afford it, definitely get it.
P nom nom nom
P the best in the world :)
P when here be sure to visit...it's fantastic!!
P so many chocolates!!!
U very crowded!
P careful here! what you think is a small bag of m&m's may be bigger than you think and may end up costing $100 or more quite easily! you get to pick your colors though, and many colors there are.
P the coconut ones are delicious.
P this is a surreal place to be at midnight.
U chile estuvo aquí!!
P do shrooms before coming here to heighten the experience.
P this is a nice place 2 go 2 and buy some m&ms.
U es el universo de colores de los tradicionales chocolates en pastillas. para niños, y no tanto
U if you're looking for an angry white rapper... wrong place
U muito caro!!! mesmo assim não tem como não comprar! aqui vc acha todos  os tipos de dispensers mm.
U attention à l'overdose...
U only way down from 3rd floor is stairs or elevator, which can be slow.
P coconut m&m's are just a blast. don't forget to try the peanut butter ones, and those with almond!
N so crowded ... be ready to push some little kids out the way. people will also try to cut you in line.
U puedes crear miles de combinaciones de bolsitas de m&m. cachondisima la "estatua de la libertad" de la segunda planta.
P love this place! especially the coconut m & m's! you can try a little bit of everything!
U ?????? ?????????
P so cool!!!
P check it if you wanna feel what heaven is
U venden detalles espectaculares, y el olor a chocolate del lugar es exquisito
P raspberry!
P free restrooms on the top floor by the esculators.
U ???? ???? ?? ? ??? ????? ??? ??? ?? ???? ??? ? ?? ??
P eat all the green m&m's
U bathrooms on 3rd floor.
U say hi to dr. photog.
P g.g. the bartender rocks!
U $5 margaritas on thursday. you need 2.
U $5 prosecco fridays
P if you're ready to lose it and start to run people down...step into here. it's like a time warp! from all the mayhem to tranquilly just by walking through a door! drinks are great too!
P emily is the best y'all
U time’s square aspen social nyc at monday, dec 31, 2012
P the caipirinhas taste a bit funky since they are made with cranberry and apple juice.
U head to aspen for its 5th annual lodge of horror halloween bash! held on saturday, october 27th from 10pm - 4am and it includes a 1 hour vodka open bar from 10pm - 11pm. tickets starting at $10.
U http://joonbug.com/newyork/halloween/aspen-social-nyc-new-york/u9duha2ydtj on saturday, october 27th it is the 5th annual lodge of horror halloween bash!
U 4th annual halloween bash 2012 party at saturday, oct 27, 2012. buy tickets at http://www.kicktickets.com/new-york/2055/2012/10/27/4th-annual-halloween-bash-aspen-social
U 4th annual halloween bash saturday, oct 27, 2012 09:00 pm tickets at http://www.kicktickets.com/new-york/2055/2012/10/27/4th-annual-halloween-bash-aspen-social
U midtown west: only $25 for 1.5 hours of unlimited brunch cocktails like mimosas and bloodies.  simple menu, but quiet place for brunch.
N count your change!!!! if you buy a drink for $15.25 (for a crappy mojito) they will try to charge you $16 and say that "the manager is not here so we don't have sny silver." wtf?
P steak tacos  tortilla soup burger all good! lounge music
U the good dj doesn't arrive until around 130am..before 130am..it's just techno music. if u're looking to dance go after 130am..
P polenta fries are surprisingly good..
P this place is great!  tucked away on w47th street the food was just fab!
N if i wanted to drink orange juice all day i'd do it from the comfort of my bed.  and for $25 less.
N the worst pancakes in the world! drink here, don't eat!
P monday happy hours. i will be here every monday. cutest atmosphere tucked in wretched times square
P good saturday night dj. could sometimes get a little too musty though.
P great atmosphere; love the interior design and decorations.
P very friendly bar staff
P ask for sameer. he's a manager extraordinaire.
P the best polenta fries (ask for the special hot sauce)
P go here after seeing a broadway show to get away from the crazy times square crowds.
P come by and say hello! #teamblackberry
P this place is hot. great music and great crowd.
U say your on jgirl's list at the door of aspen social club every friday and saturday night for free admission
P went there once a & it left such a good impression. it's like going to aspen, without going all the way to the real thing. don't forget on fridays ladies get free champers till 11pm while stocks last
P awesome food !!!
P roast <3's perabell !
P nice menu and outdoor seating in town
P the tuna tartar is serious!!
P missed my perabell...
P revel in the chogian glory!
P great mac and cheese!
P voted #1 new american food restaurant on long island by zagat and there not lyingggg!!
N i find the atmosphere noisy. went for anniversary dinner. it was so packed and noisy. felt like i was at a bar. if you plan on a quiet meal, this isn't the place.
P get the lobster blt roll and a toxic sludge
P call me fixated, but the chophouse burger is a must-have every time. great food at a reasonable price with incomparable atmosphere
P do yourself a favor and order the spicy tuna pizza. love it!! the mango slaw is so good too.
P great bar scene. arugala salad and mussels are amazing.
P burgers are typically cooked to perfection.
P thai mussels are great!
P perabell has moved down the street to a bigger and better location. 69 east main st. patchogue, next to the patchogue theatre. the new place is awesome.
P we stopped in because of restaurant week- super impressed with the food, we'll be back!
P in the bar area, if a bell rings and someone yells,"drinks on the lights!"; place your drink on 1 of the circular lights. if the light stops on the circle with your drink, you win a free drink! sweet!
P the veal porterhouse special tonight was phenomenal!
P try something off the specials.  they are always fabulous. specials change weekly.
P wide variety of lipsticks and eyelashes...and affordable!
U this huge cosmetics store above the chelsea market caters to make-up artists, but it’s equally good for savvy civilians looking for the polish beauty brand’s complete collection.
P great time shopping here. i am in love with the gel liner. i have used many types. this is the most pigmented i have experienced. the staff is very friendly and helpful.
U it's new year's 2012 in times square! check out our website for the official news, schedules, faq's, & everything you need to know about celebrating nye in times square! http://www.timessquarenyc.org
P best cosmetics selection in ny, at sephora private label prices or cheaper. go there!
U inglot will present an in-store event from 5 – 9pm in celebration of fashion's night out. enjoy mocktails and light hors d'oeuvres, while an inglot makeup artist gives you a mini red carpet makeover!
U check out the new 20 pan size circle & square palettes!
P check out the new lashes! they're all amazing!
P must pick up one or two of the freedom system palettes
P iced tea + pineapple + watermelon = ridiculously delicious. try it, you won't be disappointed!
P omg i could eat a tub of their pina colada!
P bubblegum water icey!!
P coconut raspberry tart is epic
P graham cracker is the shit
N worst friendlys ever.. expect to wait forever for the wrong thing
N don't go here but if you do get an oreo friend-z
P i like whipped creaming.
N do yourself a favor and do not go to this friendlys. waited 15 minutes for someone to come by and no one showed up to take our order.
P ask: for anna very nice young waitress.
N do not recommend you eat anything here except for ice cream.  super melt was absolutely disgusting.  couldn't even eat it.
U no more chocolate softserve ice cream crazy!
N don't go to this friendlys. they always manage a way to f up the order.
P the most fabulous view of the skyline across the hudson!
P pause here for an incredible panoramic view of manhattan. see? new jersey isn't so bad!
